Aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa1111111111111111111111111111111111111
雅思口语part1参考示例:
Iaaaaaaaaaaaa use an electronic English dictionary on a daily basis,since i am used to browsing an English news app during commuting and can spot some new words or phrases so often.
aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaI like them both. I've got a wide range of paper dictionaries for English learning,and it was really a help when i was at university.But now i prefer the electronic one since it can easily go with me.
bbbbbbbbbbbbbbit won't be a overstatement to call me a English dictionary buff. I have Oxford English dictionary,Cambridge English dictionary for sure. and i also have a oral English dictionary, a dictionary for English slang, a dictionary for euphemism, a dictionary for collocation, a dictionary for grammar.Oh the list can go on and on. But in a nut shell, they are all for English learning.
dddddddddddddddI believe no matter the dictionary is paper or digital,it is to?satisfy user's need.So in the future, paper dictionary will provide more than just a book. Maybe more dictionaries will have their own websites and online?versions and develop into a community covering more than just language learning.
2222222222222222222222222222
44444444444444444
555555555555555555555555555
666666666666666611111111111111111111111111
bbbbbbbbbbbbbbbb
ccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccccc
ggggggggggggggggggggggggggggggggggg
ddddddddddddddddddddddddd
aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa
dwaawdawwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwww2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents occasions.For example,we generally send carnations to our teachers on Teacher’s day to express our gratitudes and send roses to our lovers.
推荐雅思口语语料：Plants
street market
Describe a time that you were shopping in a street market
You should say:
When it was
Where it was
What you bought
How you felt about the shopping experience


color
1.What’s your favourite colour?你最喜欢的颜色是什么?

My favourite colour is white, it is the colour of purity and it also symobolies peace.Besides,I think the white color really goes well with my clothes and shoes.
2.Are there any colours you dislike (Why?)你不喜欢什么颜色(为什么?)
I don’t like the pink because it is too girly
3.Are colours important to you?颜色对你来说很重要吗?
I suppose so. You know, different colour conveys different?meaning?to people. Red represents passion and enthusiasm while black means elegant and stability . So I always choose the?suitable?colours at diffrent occasions.

4.\Were colours important to you when you were a child?所示.当你还是个孩子的时候，颜色对你来说很重要吗?
5.
If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with dark because I believe dark represents stability and formal, for example I always choose the dark outfit in a formal occasion like interviews or reply
5. Are there any colours that have a special meaning in your country?在你的国家有什么颜色有特别的意义吗?
Yes, there are many colours that have special meaning in my country.Taking red as an example, it means lucky and good fortune in China, when it is New Year, people like to wear red clothes,pull up red couplets and give red pocket money to children.
6. What colour would you choose to paint the walls of your room?你会选择什么颜色来粉刷你房间的墙壁?
I would like to paint my walls in blue because blue symbolizes the color of the sea as it conveys calm and peace to me which could help me fall asleep.

7. Do you think different types of people like different colours?你认为不同类型的人喜欢不同的颜色吗?
Yes, I believe different people have different psychological demand for colours. Some need peace of mind, whereas others may feel like energetic or try to use different color to show their personalities.
Teachers
1.Do you think you could be a teacher?
你觉得你可以做老师么?
I don’t think I am?suitable?to be a teacher, I am not a patient man and cannot bear to repeat the same things frequently. Teachers’ job is really boring to me, you have to make your explanations as easy as possible for students to fully understand. It is a challenging job, I am afraid I cannot do it.
2. Do you have a favourite teacher?
你有最喜欢的老师么?
.Um… Yeah, I suppose I do, but it’s actually kind of hard to pick out a favourite because I’ve been really lucky with all my teachers.they’ve been really great, at least most of them anyway, but I guess my favourite teacher would have to be my chemical teacher, he was also a vice-principle. You know, a vice-principle have to deal with public affairs.However the amount of?effort?he put into his teaching was more than most of other teachers.He appeared at our class every morning on time,which means if you were late or absent from classes,he would find out.Besides,if you had any study or life problems,you were welcome to ask him for help at anytime.I really appreciate him,I think without his help,I would not had entered prestigious university as it was him that help me form a good study habit,which I will beneft from all my life.
?
3.What are the qualities of a good teacher?
好老师所具有的品质有?
I think that a good teacher is one who always is well prepared for the class instead of just reading the courseware word by word. And a good teacher should also?has a good sense of humour as, you know,nobody would sit in the class, hours after hours.
4.Should teachers use discipline in the classroom?
老师可以在教师里规训学生么?
I think yes, teachers should discipline students. In China, students should respect the teachers. 
5.Do you want to be a teacher someday?
你将来想成为老师么?
Umm! not really. I have not given it that much thought.Entering in the teaching profession is not the one that ever attracted me as I think teaching students the same content over and over again is very boring.
6. Why people choose to become teachers?
人们选择做老师的理由是?
People mostly choose to be teachers because this is the profession which is praised across the world. People always pay proper respect to a teacher regardless of geographical location. Moreover, Being a teachers could get a great sense of achievement if their students could become useful to the society in the future.
7.What kind of person makes a good teacher?
怎样的人会成为一个好老师?
The teachers help the students to grow. So, to be a good teacher, one needs to be sincere and patient. If students do not have good command of relevant knowledge,repeating teaching the same knowledge is needed. Moreover, vast subject knowledge is also required or you cannot share knowledge with your students. 8.Do you like strict teachers?
你喜欢严格的老师么?
Yeah I do. I have no problem with them at all, as long as they’re fair! Because I think, on the whole, they tend to set high standards, and so consequently, that makes us work harder and learn more. And the other good thing about strict teachers is that they keep students in line, which means that the class won’t be interrupted by naughty students who just want to joke around and be a nuisance.
9.What’s the difference between young and old teachers?
年轻的老师与年长的老师有什么区别?
There’s probably not all that much difference actually, but I guess the main one would be the level of experience. You know, I think it’s fair to say that old teachers tend to have more experience than young ones, and so they’ll be more skilled at adapting to any kind of situation that might arise in class, whereas young teachers might struggle. So that’s one difference, and I suppose another might be the use of technology, cos probably a lot of old teachers might stick to the traditional teaching methods they’re familiar with, whereas young teachers, I think, are more likely to bring technology into their teaching, such as using iPads and laptops in class. So yeah, I’d say these are probably the main differences.

Punctuality
1.Do you keep track of time usually?
你经常掌握时间么？
I certainly do. I think it’s important for most people nowadays to be able to keep track of time because we are living in a such a fast paced world where, the faster you are at doing things, the more likely you are to be successful.
2.Can you describe yourself as a punctual?person?
你可以称自己为守时的人的么？
I think I am，at least I always try to be on time. But you know, living in a city where traffic jam is an unavoidable part of the daily life makes it difficult to be a punctual person. But I wouldn’t want to use it as an excuse so I tend to set out earlier when I go to an appointment just in case.
3.Do you wear a watch?
你戴手表么？
I like wearing watches and I used to wear them. However, with changing times, I have stopped wearing one and I watch time by mobile phone.
4.Do you think it is important for an individual to be on time?
你认为守时对一个人重要么？
I think it is quite of a relative question. So, it mostly depends on the situation. For example,compared with party or travelling, if an individual is late for a meeting or a flight, the person is going to lose lot of things. Also, if you know someone is waiting for you, one must try to be on time.

5.How do you feel when others are late?
别人迟到你会作何感想？
I really don’t like people getting late.,especially for those who make various excuses for their late such as traffic jam or oversleeping.I think such this behaviour is quite irresponsible to others.
6.How often are you late?
你多久迟到一次？

我们坚持前行，只因每一个留学梦想都值得认真对待，我们不懈努力，只因每一次在线托付都无比珍贵。小站集左手名师，右手黑科技为一体的一站式智能学习系统为你全新升级而来。筑梦成长，留学就选小站。2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents occasions.For example,we generally send carnations to our teachers on Teacher’s day to express our gratitudes and send roses to our lovers.
推荐雅思口语语料：Plants
street market
Describe a time that you were shopping in a street market
You should say:
When it was
Where it was
What you bought
How you felt about the shopping experience


color
1.What’s your favourite colour?你最喜欢的颜色是什么?

My favourite colour is white, it is the colour of purity and it also symobolies peace.Besides,I think the white color really goes well with my clothes and shoes.
2.Are there any colours you dislike (Why?)你不喜欢什么颜色(为什么?)
I don’t like the pink because it is too girly
3.Are colours important to you?颜色对你来说很重要吗?
I suppose so. You know, different colour conveys different?meaning?to people. Red represents passion and enthusiasm while black means elegant and stability . So I always choose the?suitable?colours at diffrent occasions.

4.\Were colours important to you when you were a child?所示.当你还是个孩子的时候，颜色对你来说很重要吗?
5.
If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with dark because I believe dark represents stability and formal, for example I always choose the dark outfit in a formal occasion like interviews or reply
5. Are there any colours that have a special meaning in your country?在你的国家有什么颜色有特别的意义吗?
Yes, there are many colours that have special meaning in my country.Taking red as an example, it means lucky and good fortune in China, when it is New Year, people like to wear red clothes,pull up red couplets and give red pocket money to children.
6. What colour would you choose to paint the walls of your room?你会选择什么颜色来粉刷你房间的墙壁?
I would like to paint my walls in blue because blue symbolizes the color of the sea as it conveys calm and peace to me which could help me fall asleep.

7. Do you think different types of people like different colours?你认为不同类型的人喜欢不同的颜色吗?
Yes, I believe different people have different psychological demand for colours. Some need peace of mind, whereas others may feel like energetic or try to use different color to show their personalities.
Teachers
1.Do you think you could be a teacher?
你觉得你可以做老师么?
I don’t think I am?suitable?to be a teacher, I am not a patient man and cannot bear to repeat the same things frequently. Teachers’ job is really boring to me, you have to make your explanations as easy as possible for students to fully understand. It is a challenging job, I am afraid I cannot do it.
2. Do you have a favourite teacher?
你有最喜欢的老师么?
.Um… Yeah, I suppose I do, but it’s actually kind of hard to pick out a favourite because I’ve been really lucky with all my teachers.they’ve been really great, at least most of them anyway, but I guess my favourite teacher would have to be my chemical teacher, he was also a vice-principle. You know, a vice-principle have to deal with public affairs.However the amount of?effort?he put into his teaching was more than most of other teachers.He appeared at our class every morning on time,which means if you were late or absent from classes,he would find out.Besides,if you had any study or life problems,you were welcome to ask him for help at anytime.I really appreciate him,I think without his help,I would not had entered prestigious university as it was him that help me form a good study habit,which I will beneft from all my life.
?
3.What are the qualities of a good teacher?
好老师所具有的品质有?
I think that a good teacher is one who always is well prepared for the class instead of just reading the courseware word by word. And a good teacher should also?has a good sense of humour as, you know,nobody would sit in the class, hours after hours.
4.Should teachers use discipline in the classroom?
老师可以在教师里规训学生么?
I think yes, teachers should discipline students. In China, students should respect the teachers. 
5.Do you want to be a teacher someday?
你将来想成为老师么?
Umm! not really. I have not given it that much thought.Entering in the teaching profession is not the one that ever attracted me as I think teaching students the same content over and over again is very boring.
6. Why people choose to become teachers?
人们选择做老师的理由是?
People mostly choose to be teachers because this is the profession which is praised across the world. People always pay proper respect to a teacher regardless of geographical location. Moreover, Being a teachers could get a great sense of achievement if their students could become useful to the society in the future.
7.What kind of person makes a good teacher?
怎样的人会成为一个好老师?
The teachers help the students to grow. So, to be a good teacher, one needs to be sincere and patient. If students do not have good command of relevant knowledge,repeating teaching the same knowledge is needed. Moreover, vast subject knowledge is also required or you cannot share knowledge with your students. 8.Do you like strict teachers?
你喜欢严格的老师么?
Yeah I do. I have no problem with them at all, as long as they’re fair! Because I think, on the whole, they tend to set high standards, and so consequently, that makes us work harder and learn more. And the other good thing about strict teachers is that they keep students in line, which means that the class won’t be interrupted by naughty students who just want to joke around and be a nuisance.
9.What’s the difference between young and old teachers?
年轻的老师与年长的老师有什么区别?
There’s probably not all that much difference actually, but I guess the main one would be the level of experience. You know, I think it’s fair to say that old teachers tend to have more experience than young ones, and so they’ll be more skilled at adapting to any kind of situation that might arise in class, whereas young teachers might struggle. So that’s one difference, and I suppose another might be the use of technology, cos probably a lot of old teachers might stick to the traditional teaching methods they’re familiar with, whereas young teachers, I think, are more likely to bring technology into their teaching, such as using iPads and laptops in class. So yeah, I’d say these are probably the main differences.

Punctuality
1.Do you keep track of time usually?
你经常掌握时间么？
I certainly do. I think it’s important for most people nowadays to be able to keep track of time because we are living in a such a fast paced world where, the faster you are at doing things, the more likely you are to be successful.
2.Can you describe yourself as a punctual?person?
你可以称自己为守时的人的么？
I think I am，at least I always try to be on time. But you know, living in a city where traffic jam is an unavoidable part of the daily life makes it difficult to be a punctual person. But I wouldn’t want to use it as an excuse so I tend to set out earlier when I go to an appointment just in case.
3.Do you wear a watch?
你戴手表么？
I like wearing watches and I used to wear them. However, with changing times, I have stopped wearing one and I watch time by mobile phone.
4.Do you think it is important for an individual to be on time?
你认为守时对一个人重要么？
I think it is quite of a relative question. So, it mostly depends on the situation. For example,compared with party or travelling, if an individual is late for a meeting or a flight, the person is going to lose lot of things. Also, if you know someone is waiting for you, one must try to be on time.

5.How do you feel when others are late?
别人迟到你会作何感想？
I really don’t like people getting late.,especially for those who make various excuses for their late such as traffic jam or oversleeping.I think such this behaviour is quite irresponsible to others.
6.How often are you late?
你多久迟到一次？
For most part, I try to be on time, but sometimes in order to finish my assignments I may stay up late and oversleep the next day.But, in formal situations like meetings or for flights, I am punctual enough in case of causing any trouble.
7.Do you feel guilty when you are late?
迟到时你会觉得内疚么？
I think it is quite of a relative question .For me, being late for class for less than five minutes is not a big deal .But if someone especially your tutor or boss is wating for you, I will definitely feel bad
8.What are some of the ways by which you think people can come on time?
有哪些守时的方法？
Well, I believe being on time is just a matter of attitude.every time you are late for the small things that do not matter much, there are more chances that you are likely to be late when big things come up. Also, if you consider something matter, there are less chances that you shall be late for it.Setting alarm clocks is also an effective way.
9.When does time seem to move fast, and when does it seem to move slowly?
什么时候你觉得时间过得很快，什么时候觉得过得慢？
How long is one minute,this depends on if you are inside 
or waiting outside of the toilet.If you do something you like, you will feel that one hour is as long as one minute and the other way around.

10.If you could go back in time, what is the one thing you would do differently?
如果你可以回到过去，有哪件事，你会以不同的方式去做？
There is nothing much that I wish to change with my life, but if there could be one thing, I think that I want to spend more time with my parents and grandparents when I was a child .As when you grow up,due to your college study or work.The time you stay with them is quite limited and sooner or later, they will leave the world before you.

animals
1.Do you like animals?
 I don’t hate them. I am not very much of an animal lover but I like them if they exist and I am able to see them. But, owning an animal might be something I won’t prefer as looking after the animals could be really troublesome.


2.What’s your favorite animal? Why?
I love dogs a lot. I think they are the best friends of human.Compared with ohter animals,dogs are more clever and loyal,and you could also play with them.

3.Are people in your country fond of animals?
 Yes, they are. People in my country love animals. You could find a dog or a cat being owned by a family. And it is not for any monetary reasons but because they love being around them and caring for them. Animals do bring a certain extent of happiness to the people.
4.What kinds of animals as a pet do the people have in your country?
As a pet, most of the people have dogs in their house. Dogs are preferred over other animals because firstly they are very loyal to their owner. Also, the small dogs are adorable while the large dogs could guard the house for us.
5.Compared with the past, have there been any changes concerning pets in your country/hometown?
Definitely yes, there have been many observable changes in our country.For example,people in the past like keeping the large dogs to guard their houses while at the present time people tend to keep pet dogs as their life companions.

6.Do you think cities are?suitable?places for keeping a pet?
you can take your pets to the nearby pet clinic and see a veterinarian or get them vaccinated.you can also take your pets to pet center.Besides the supermarkets in cities provide a variety of pet foods.Compared to rural areas, it is easier to keep pets in the city

7.Do children like animals?
 I assume It all depends。Some children love animals and regard them as their friends while there are also children who scared of them and not like them. Also, there are some who like to irritate animals just for the sake of fun.
8.What kind of animals do you think children like?
I think for most part, children love dogs and cats. Because compared with other animals they are more clever anad friendly.By playing with them,children can have a lot of fun.
10. Did you have any pets when you were a child?
When I was a child, I really hoped that I could have a pet dog, but my parents never gave me a chance as they think keeping pets is really troublesome and time-consuming
11.What do you think are the benefits of a child having a pet?
I think the most evident benefit is it could mould children’s characters in a positive way.For example,by raising pets and playing with them, children could develop a sense of responsibility and become more compassionate and caring.
12.If you have children in the future, will you allow them to raise a pet?
Definitely yes. I think having a pet in the house is very important because it allows the kids to learn about love, patience,and so much more. It could brings happiness and togetherness.

High school
1.How old were you when you started school?
I started my elementary school since seven year old.
2.Where did you go to school?
3. How did you get to school each day?
My school was just located near my home, about 5minutes’walk,so every day I walked to school by myself
4. Tell me something about the school. (=Can you describe it?)
My school is called the Tiantao Elementary School, which was established 40 years ago in my hometown. The school was large with about 800 students. Besides, the teachers there were always kind-hearted and responsible for their teaching.






5Did you enjoy it? (Why?/Why not?)
Definitely yes, those days are really memorable for me as compared with Junior and Senior school,I didn’t have the stressful study burden at that period, so most of time I played with my classmates a lot. Therefore, it’s a golden period of my life and these days never come back.

6.What were some of the most popular activities at primary school?
There are several engaging activities in my school, such as sports meeting when the whole school played sports together. There were some exciting competitions like 100 metres dash, or relay race. Besides, we went autumn and spring outing every year to some local natural sceneries. We could have a picnic and enjoy the happy time with our classmates there.
7.Have you ever returned to see your old school again?
 As my old school is not far away from the place I live .Every time I go back to my hometown, I’d like to visit my old school and I’ll be very delighted to see how my school developed. I was really proud of it.
8.Are you still in contact with any of the friends you had in primary school?
Yes, there were several close friends when I was in my elementary school, and we still keep in touch with each other. We cherish our friendship and we have a party almost every year.

9.What subjects did you study in secondary school (=high school)?
There were many subjects we had to learn at secondary school, such as maths, English, physics, chemistry,?history, geography, biology and so on. So you can see we really had a heavy burden at that time.

10.What was your favourite subject in secondary school (=high school)?
In my secondary school, English was my favourite subject because I found it more interesting and easy to learn compared with other subjects.I always got a high score in English test.

11.And which subject did you like the least? (Why?)
As for my unfavourable subject, I guess the politics was the most disgusting subject because I had to remember endless and?meaningless essays in order to pass the exams by rote. It was really a waste of my time.

12.Which secondary school subject do you think is most useful for people in adult life?
I believe that the physics was quite helpful in both my study and life.As you could do various sports in PE class,which woul help you keep in good shape and recharge your battery at the same time.

13.What part of your secondary school education did you enjoy most?
I think I enjoyed the PE class most.As in secondary school,you had to learn many subjects and do endless exercises.So PE class was a good stress reliever and could also help you recharge your battery.

14.How do you feel about your high school (secondary school)?
I believe that my secondary school had taught me how to endure hardships if I wanted to achieve my goal. You know, in my country, the competition of entering university is badly fierce, as you need to in top 10% in order to enter a good university.so I had to work very hard in order to be eligible to pursue my education in the future.

15.Why did you choose to attend that particular school?
I guess is that my secondary school has a rich history and provides a good learning atmosphere for us.The teachers there were strict and helpful and we put in 14 to 18 hours a day studying .As a result,including myself,many students in our school get accepted to a good university every year.

Daily Routine
1.what is the busiest part of the day for you?
From about 8 o'clock to 6 pm. That is when i have to attend class and prepare for English test.so time is very tight for me
2.What part of your day do you like best?
My favourite part of the day is early morning, because it is a beginning of a brand new day, and you should go on fighting for your dream.the weather is generally pleasant and cool.
3.Do you usually have the same routine every day
Almost. I start my day with white coffee, then rush to the train station to go to work and back home. Not too much room for flexibility when you work 9 hours a day and you are 12 hours out of the house. I dream of becoming a freelancer especially for this reason.
4.What is your daily routine?
In a typical weekday I have to wake up a bit early and revise my university lessons and then I rush to the university campus to attend the lecture. At around 2.00 pm I eat my lunch in the cafeteria and spent the whole evening in the library. After I return home at around 7.00 pm I spent my time in my study room and have my dinner with my family members. I watch a news channel for an hour and then get back to my room. I read a story book for a while and at around 1.00 am I go to bed.
5.Do you ever change your routine?
I always want some changes in my life, so my routines also are constantly changing. I do not like to have mundane or routine set of activities each day, that would be boring. Also, having different patterns can keep others guessing about your whereabouts, just adds to the security factor!
6.Do you think it is important to have a daily routine?
Not really. I try to make each of my day a little different to the?previous?one, to keep me motivated and to add to the fun.
7.What would you like to change in your day to day routine?
I would like to get up earlier in the morning than I do now. Next, I would like to take up regular exercises in a gymnasium. Apart from that, I would like to leave office/ university early to walk in the park for an hour. Apart from that, my current daily routine is all good.
8.Are all your days the same?
Not really. For me, a day-off is quite different than the busy working day in every?perspective. Apart from that different circumstances and events make the days different from each other. While Sunday is a day to spend time with my family members and to meet friends and play with them in the evening, I have a tight schedule at the university and work on Monday.
9. when time do you get up?
Well, let's see. Some days I wake up early. Maybe about 6 o'clock. Yeah, sometimes I wake up at 6 o'clock.When I get up early, I like to get ready for the day, take a shower and have breakfast. But other days, I don't like getting up early. Maybe I'll sleep in until 10:00 or 11:00.

Work&study
work
1. Do you work or study?
· I graduated a few years ago and I’m now in full time employment.
2. What is your job?
· I’m currently an English teacher working for the British Council in Ho Chi Minh City.
3. Why did you choose that job?
· I was?previously a lawyer and found it to be really stressful and never had any free time, so after quitting that job I thought teaching might be the?complete?opposite of being a lawyer, you know not as stressful and more time off.
4. Are there lots of English teachers in Ho Chi Minh City?
· Oh yes! There is a such a big demand for English as a second language here and it’s also quite a cheap place to live compared to many other big cities in Asia.
5. Do you enjoy your job?
· Most of the time. It’s very rewarding to be able to help people every day and the students here are very hardworking and fun to teach, but you sometimes have lessons that do go so well and the money could always be better.
6. Do you get on well with your co-workers?
· Yes, fine. I don’t really see work as part of my social life, so I don’t socialise with them, so I suppose I could be more friendly, but it’s just my nature to be a bit colder with colleagues. I think it’s more professional to be that way.
7. What was your first day at work like?
· There were lots of teachers starting at the same time as me, 10 I think, so we all had a big induction day. The more senior teachers ran workshops with us to familarise us with the different systems they had and then we went for a team dinner in the evening.
8. What responsibilities do you have at work?
· All of the teachers main responsibility is to plan good lessons and then teach them to the best of our ability. On top of that we have several admin. tasks to carry out like mark homework, fill out attendance sheets and write reports.
9. Would you like to change your job in the future?
· Yes, as I said before, I like working by myself, so I would like to be my own boss. I’m currently developing my own website, so if it’s successful I will leave teaching and work on it full time. This will also give me more time to work on other projects.
10. What is your typical day like in work?
· I normally have 2 or 3 classes in the evening and I start the day by doing all the planning at home. This normally takes between an hour or two depending on the lessons. I then take the rest of the day to spend with my family, before going to work around 3 to print off my materials and then I teach all evening.
11. What would you change about your job?
· As with most English teachers, we have to teach what is on the curriculum and this can mean that you are teaching some things that are quite boring or not very useful for your students, so I would like to have more freedom to teach outside the syllabus.
12. What do you do?
13. Presently, I am working with Fox Traveller as a host for their show that involves travelling around India and discovering its culture and people. We already have covered the southern part of India and now we shall be moving towards the eastern part. The show will go on air in January next year.
14. What are your responsibilities at your work place?
15. My main?objective?is to make sure that we get the information required. So, for instance, if we are travelling to Mysore, instead of talking about the places everyone goes, I need to make sure we cover the places no one ever has. Like the best and the cheapest place to eat. It requires lot of research and I mostly go to the place 10 days before our team arrives.
16. How many hours do you work each day?
17. Well, we don’t have any particular routine. Sometimes the work demands us to work ten hours, sometimes more than that, sometimes less. So, it is all on the location and the time it requires to give us the required information. Also, for me this is something that I love, so mostly work doesn’t seems like work.
18. Do you enjoy your work?
19. Oh! I love it. The feeling that you get after meeting so many people and talking with them and realizing how happy they are after all the issues they have. I remember we went out to shoot a village in Mysore and initially we thought the people would be very unhappy because of the limitations they had, but to our surprise they were all very happy and it was fun knowing their ways of living.
20. If given a chance to change your work place, would you do that?
21. At present, my workplace is great for me. I am loving the people I work with and enjoy the work that I am doing. So as of now, I don’t see myself changing the place. But, may be after some time, if the work is getting repetitive or there is no more learning for me, I may change.
22. Is there some other kind of work you would prefer to do?
23. I surely love the work that I do, but may be if time allows, instead of hosting shows I would prefer writing about my experiences of the places I visit. May be because when one writes a lot more gets expressed which is not possible why saying things off in television.
24. If you could change your profession, what would you do?
25. Well, I think may be I will open a company that gives equal education rights to people. While travelling, I realized that there are so many children who don’t get education, and even if they get it is not of good quality. So, I will open a business that provides good quality education to people who cannot afford it.

Study
1. Do you work or study?
· I’m currently a student at Queen’s University, Belfast.
2. What do you study?
· I study law because it’s a really well thought of degree and I’m hoping to pursue it as a career in the future.
3. Is it a popular subject at your university?
· Very popular, in fact it’s one of the most sought after courses. I think there are about 350 people reading law at Queen’s. I think lots of student’s parents want them to study law so they can get a good job after they graduate.
4. Do you enjoy studying it?
· It’s such a huge subject that there will always be parts you like and parts you don’t like. I find Human Rights fascinating because it can really make a difference to peoples’ lives. On the other hand, modules like Land Law and Equity are really boring.
5. Do you get along with your classmates?
· Yes, they are all really great. Most people like to socialise together in the evenings and this makes us a very tight group. If you know someone socially, it is much easier to work together in class.
6. If you could change to another subject, what would it be?
· I planned to study medicine, but then when I went on work experience I fainted at the first sight of blood, so definitely not that. I’m a real history buff and read books about World War 2 all the time, so I suppose it would have to be Modern History.
7. Do you plan to use the subject you are studying in the future?
· Yes, I’ve already started to apply for jobs as a lawyer. We normally have to secure a job a year before we graduate and then work very hard to get a high overall mark. After that, I will probably do a Masters in law to become a specialist in one particular area.
8. What is the most difficult part of your subject?
· You have to remember lots of legislation and cases and not only remember their names, but also how the affect each part of the law and how they interact with each other. Physically it can also be exhausting because we have to read very dense texts for a few hours every day.
9. What would like to study in the future?
· As I said before, my favourite type of law is Human Rights, so I would like to do a masters in International Human Rights Law. it’s right at the cutting edge of my field and there are also lots of very high profile cases in the media, so it’s really exciting and something I would like to become an expert in.
10. Why did you choose your university?
· Mostly because it is close to my hometown and most of my friends were going there. I kind of regret it now. It’s a great university, but because it’s so close to home it doesn’t give you much of a chance to experience new things and meet new people. If I were to choose again, I’d study abroad.

saving money in childhood
1.Did you save money when you were young?
你年前的时候省钱么
I was never a hoarder of spare money when i was young since my parents have quite strict rules on the money could be disposed of by kids.But i did save 1000 RMB for around 2 years to buy my dream speed bicycle.
2.Do your parents give you money for house cleaning?
你的父母会因为你做家庭清洁而给你钱么?
No, never.Just as they raise me an educated and healthy man for nothing, i, though not so much ,not so often and mostly not so gladly,do the house cleaning for free.
3.Have you ever given money to other children?
你有给其他孩子钱过么?
No, as far as i can recall. Guess i'm not a guy of sharing and i didn't have enough pocket money even for my little fantasies and desires in my childhood.
4.Do you think parents should teach children to save money?
你觉得父母应教孩子节约用钱么?
Yes, i think knowing how to save money itself is a valuable life skill and will benefit your whole life. It is also a habit hard to acquire and it is best for one to understand the importance and learn the skills of money saving from a tender young age, instructed by parents.

Sports
1.Do you like to watch sports on TV?
你喜欢用电视观看体育运动么？
It’s really entertaining to watch sports. In fact, I have subscribed to various sports television channels at my home so that I can?watch?live games such as?the all the world-class football matches or tennis open games.
2.When did you first become interested in sports?
你什么时候开始对体育运动感兴趣的？
As far as I remember, there was a cricket match between India and Pakistan and my entire family was watching that on television. After sometime, the match became dicey and I also started participating in the?conversation. That match fueled my interest in sports and I found myself close to the fields after that day.
3.Do you play any sports?
你玩任何运动么？
I don't prefer a specific kind of sport, but I really like working out in the gym… That helps me to keep my body in a good shape.
4.Do you have a favorite sports star?
你有最喜欢的体育明星么？
I feel that my favourite sports star is Messi who is a forward in Barcelona. He is the perfect blend of speed, strength, skill and toughness. He is also an icon in the modern football.
5.What kinds of sports are popular in China?
中国什么运动比较流行？
It’s very hard to figure out “the most popular sport” in China, but I would say the most popular sports are probably soccer, basketball, track and field (mostly for students), table tennis, and badminton. Some martial arts including Tai Chi are being revived and popularized these days too.
6.What kinds of sports would you like to try in the future?
未来你想尝试什么新的运动？
Well, I guess what I’ll try in the future is the tennis because it can help me build my strength and improve my flexibility and balance. Besides, tennis is social, it’s a sport I can enjoy with friends if I play regularly.
7.Do you think the sports chosen by young people and old people are?similar?
你人为年轻人和老年人从事的体育运动类似么？
Not really. There may be some age-friendly sports like walking, swimming and dancing that all kinds people should and like to do, but in?general, old people tend not to play aggressive team sports like young people madly do, such as football, basketball.



volunteer
1. Why do you think people volunteer?
2. Would you like to work as a volunteer?
3. Have you ever done any volunteer work?
4. Is volunteering worth the time it takes?
5. What could you do to help if you had no money?
6. What is volunteer screening?
7. What situations need volunteer workers?
8. Can you think of different types of volunteer work?
9. Would you volunteer to help people outside your community?
10. Have you read a book about volunteer work?
11. What types of volunteer work would be unpleasant for you?
12. What benefits other than?personal?satisfaction could you?personally get by volunteering?
13. Can a volunteer be treated the same as paid staff?
14. Should you volunteer if your main reason is to benefit monetarily or materialistically?
雅思口语part1：volunteer 参考答案
1. I believe there could be several reasons for people volunteering. Some people volunteer because they feel for the cause and want to do something about it. There are some who volunteer because volunteering teaches you a lot. You learn team work, leadership, patience, organizing things and so much more.
2. Definitely yes. I would love to work as a volunteer for an organization related to education, because I do feel that this is something that every individual has a right to have, but very few are able to get the quality education. Anyone who initiates it in some way, I would volunteer. Or may be in some time, start it off on my own.
3. Yes, I was a volunteer for a group named Soften in our organization. The group organizes lot of activities for the under privileged children and I was part of their three day workshop. During that period, lot of kids from the adoption homes and other sections of society came and it was great to listen to them, their stories, their experiences and so much more.
4. Yes it is. I believe it is more of two way relation where the more you give, the more you gain. There is so much of experience that comes along with it, so much you get to learn and so much of excitement that it makes up for the effort it takes.
5. Helping has nothing to do with money. May be I cannot give someone the money but I can surely give what I have, like my knowledge, my experience, the things that I have learnt. It is great to be able to share your knowledge and for the one who receives it, it is surely a pure joy.
6. Volunteer screening is the process in which people are screened or judged so that they can be given work that best fits their?personality.
7. Situations which affect the larger group of people needs volunteer work. Because at that time, you cannot think about money and then one also needs lot of people. Like, when there was a Tsunami, lot of people died, so many were homeless and then there were many who could not find their loved one. It was such a massive destruction, that required help from the entire planet.
8. Volunteering has its own different shades. There is this volunteering where an individual goes to an organization and works on one of their projects. It could be for a month or a year. And then there is gap year volunteering. This is the volunteering which students tend to do during their gap year. It provides them with the necessary skills for placements. Also, there is travel volunteering wherein the individual can volunteer for different causes while traveling.
9. Definitely yes. Volunteering or for that matter helping has nothing to do with community. If I can help anyone I will be more than happy to do it.
10. There is this book that I read, chicken soup for the soul. It was a great book, almost an eye opener. It talks about 101 inspiring stories that talk about volunteers and their experiences and how they gave back what they got.
11. I think volunteering for something like “trying to ban valentines day” or for that matter “the organizations bringing religious law and order”. These are things I would prefer not to go forward for. Because, they go against my opinion about how things should be.
12. Volunteering has its own great advantages. It increases your social and relationship skills, it helps you make more friends and in some way be more connected with your society. Even more, it helps counteracts the effects of stress, anger and anxiety. Some believe it also helps in fighting depression. Then there are people who are alone, like the older people, volunteering gives them the sense or purpose for life.
13. I think it is quite a tough thing to do. Because, a volunteer is more often selected more easily as compared to a paid staff. There is certain skill set that is required, but with volunteer it is less of risk. It might be possible that a volunteer makes a mistake but with a paid staff the chances should be less.
14. I think, at the first place, the main motive for volunteering should always be to benefit others. However, if one thinks of it in a monetarily or materialistically manner and does it, I think they still should do it. Because at the end both sides gain a lot.

Leisure time
1.What?do you do in your spare time?
I love reading and writing when I have some free time available. Apart from these, I also like playing badminton. So, whenever I do get time, I usually read, write or play badminton.
2.What?do you do to relax yourself?
For relaxation, I prefer taking a short nap. It could be either for 20 minutes or may be an hour. But, nothing helps me relax better than some sleep.
3.What?do you usually spend your weekends?
During the weekdays, most part of the evenings usually gets lost doing the office work. But, during weekends, I work on my blog for the entire day and so during evenings I usually spend some time with my friends, going on long walks together or have dinner at their place.
4.What?do you usually do after work or classes?
There is nothing much that can be done after work because it really becomes quite tiring. So, most of the times I am either working on my blog or writing something or some drafts, here and there.
5.Do you prefer?staying at home or going out during evenings?
I love taking long walks. So, if I am not busy at something during evenings, I usually take long walks with my friends or for that matter even alone at times.
6.Do you?think modern lifestyles give enough time to people for leisure?
I think it depends on the kind of modern lifestyle an individual is leading. So, a?person?doing a corporate job might have less time to spare for leisure activity but probably a person who does freelancing will find more time to leisure. Not because a work is less time consuming but because the way things get done in each. Even more, I think it all depends on how the person sets priorities for themselves.
7.Do you think?people today have more time to relax as compared to that in past?
I certainly believe that people are more busy when compared with their past counterparts. Earlier people lived a content life but with changing times people are less satisfied with what they have and are always on the look out of doing more. This has made lives much more hectic than ever.
8.What do you?think is the importance of leisure time in life?
Leisure is the one thing that makes the life worth living. I surely believe that apart from the daily mundane activities a person should always try to do things that makes him or her happy. It could be either something that he or she likes doing or could even be some person one likes spending time with. It is only through this that a person is able to enjoy life.
9.Do you think?old and young people spend their leisure time in the same way?
I believe it is not about young and old, it is more about individuals. I have seen old people party harder than some of the young chaps out there and then some young people reading better than the wiser older people. In my opinion, it is all about the individual choices that people make.
10.Do you like?to travel in holidays?
Well, I love travelling not only because everyone else does but because for me travelling teaches so much more to me than anything else can ever do. Also, travelling allows me to explore myself and the world in ways that opens up my horizons, giving me a broader aspect of life.
11.If you had a child,?what leisure places would you go with your child?
I think I would like to take my child to library and a field ( could be of any game) as part of leisure activity. Also, I would love to travel with my child because in my opinion, a child learns so much more from travelling,?history?and art than he or she can ever learn from any of the text books or any motivational videos.
12.How much time?do you have each week for doing these things?
Well, I do quite a lot of sport actually. I go swimming twice a week. There’s a very good pool just around the corner from my office. I swim for an hour and do about 40 lengths. I also cycle to work when I can. Apart from that, I do a lot of reading and photography.
13.Why?do you like doing these activities?
When I was younger, I did a lot of surfing. I used to go snowboarding quite often too in the winter. But I haven’t been for a long time, although I might go this year with some friends. These days I go cycling when I can. At the weekends I like to cook and invite friends around for dinner. I’m a big fan of cooking programs, and often try to copy the recipes, but they don’t always turn out very well.
14.Why?do you like doing these activities?
I don’t have a lot of time to myself now that I’m married with two young children. So, a lot of my free time is used taking my kids to their activities. For example, on Saturday morning, I have to take my son to his basketball games, and my daughter to football practice. Then I have to ship them off to parties or friends’ houses. Two or three times a month, my wife and I go for a meal with friends, and once a month, we go the cinema when my parents look after the kids. There’s a great little cinema that shows independent or foreign films just near where we live.
15.How?did you start doing this activity at first?
I have tennis lessons with a group of friends at the weekend. There are eight of us, four moms and dads and four kids. The idea was that the lessons would give us the chance to do something sporty with our children, and it’s great. The teacher is really good and we all have a fantastic time. Plus, we’re getting better at tennis. Best of all, after an hour of tennis, the kids go off to play, and we can have a drink and a chat. Now, that’s my idea of playing sport. Apart from that, I also go out bowling once a month.
16.Is there?some other hobby or sport you would like to try? Why?
I play golf at the weekend. I get up really early on Sunday and play for about five hours with some friends from work. While I’m out, my husband prepares lunch which is usually ready by the time I get back. Apart from that, I play online video games and read a lot. Also, I go for a drink after work every Friday with my work colleagues. There’s a pub nearby and we usually stay there for a couple of hours, which is good fun.
17.How?do you spend your time in the evening?
In the evening, I love to play music and listen to some old Bollywood songs from my favourite song collection. It just refreshes my mind, keeping me away for a while, from tension arising due to the daily routine work. I think it is a good leisure activity that makes you stay away from everyday’s stress.
18.Do you?do this every evening?
Not every evening but most of the times, I prefer to listen to my favourite songs. However, whenever I find some work to do at home in the evening, I avoid doing this. Apart from that, I sometimes like to stroll around the city along with my friends whenever I don’t get a chance to go for a morning walk.
19.What?do you like to do in the weekends?
On Saturday, I often go for watching movies along with my family members but on Sunday, I do not like to do any activity outside and I rather play games with my kids. Nowadays, it is really essential to devote some time for your kids and this is the reason why I prefer spending time with them.
20.Is there?any difference in your life now from when you were a child?
Absolutely yes, there are huge differences! Since I am now a married person with kids to take care of, I do not get enough time for fun and entertainment related activities. But when I was a child, I always used to play games with my childhood friends outside my home in a large playground, for example, we used to enjoy playing cricket vigorously. Moreover, life used to be tension free but now, it is full of stress.

hometown
1. What kind of place is it?
A. I was born in a city where I still reside, which is Nanning. 
My hometown in Nannig, which is situated on the south side of the country.Maybe you haven’t heard of its name,I suppose you must have heard about Guilin,it is a world famous city in GuangXi Province,and Nanning is the capital.It is a beautiful city with the highest green rates in China , it was also awarded “United Nations habitat award”in 2007.
2. What’s the most interesting part of your home area?
A. The modern facilities that have been brought to my hometown are, in my opinion, the most interesting parts due to which I would say that I like my hometown. The medical facilities along with the education have really developed in the past decade or so. In terms of places India Gate, Lotus temple, Qutb Minar, The Red Fort are some interesting places and attraction in my hometown.
3. What kind of jobs do the people in your town/ village do?
A. My town mostly consists of the people who belong to the working class. As a matter of fact, due to the presence of quite a many government offices in the city of New Delhi, a majority part of habitats belong to the working class. Many of them work in Government and semi-government offices while many others work in private organisations and multinational companies. The numbers of business persons are quite high as well.
4. Is your hometown changing?
A. Yes, and in a very fast pace. Over the past few years, there has been a welcoming change as far as the public transport has developed. Apart from this, as already informed, there has been an increase in the area of medical facilities in the form of hospitals catering with up to date and latest machines. More and more people are coming to live in the capital city for better employment, education and treatment. As a result, the population here is also increasing.
5. Would you say it is a good place to live? Why?
A. Yes, it definitely is a good place to live in. There are various opportunities for the employment and education, the transportation facility is nice and the beautiful and planned city is indeed a nice place to live in.
6. What changes would you like to make to your hometown?
A. The one change that I would definitely like to make to my hometown is the safety for the women. Of late, there have been instances when women have been harassed in my city. This one thing has brought shame to my town, so it would be my endeavour to bring this change to my city. Apart from that, I would like to change the way some business markets have emerged. I would like the city to have more security and law enforcing force and security camera to monitor every street vulnerable to crime.
7.What are the advantages of living in your hometown?
Answer: Obliviously, there are a variety of merits of living in this city. However, I guess the most evident would be that it is very well developed and every amenity is at a walking distance such as hospital, school, park, library and even shopping arcade. Another favourable part is its public transport in which most of the people travel daily like Metro and buses.
8.What are some problems faced by your hometown?
Answer: Apart from the problems, I illustrated above; I would say that as people from different cities are continuously moving to this urban area, housing problem emerged and it is becoming upmarket now. So, I believe that this city is very crowded now. Another drawback of this is that the beds are not available in government hospitals. So, I think there is also a shortage of medical facility now. I feel that our governing authorities should address this problem before it becomes serious.
9.Compare your hometown with another city.
Answer: If I compare my town with a smart city like London. I would like to say that this city is still lacking behind in several aspects. Firstly, we don’t have world class infrastructure such as wider roads to?accommodate?traffic. Secondly, public transportation such as Metro is still in its?construction?phase in several areas of the city. Finally, it is one of the most polluted cities of the world so many people are suffering from diseases.
10.What are some environmental problems faced by your hometown?
Answer: As I told earlier, air pollution is the biggest stumbling block for many people living here as they are suffering from diseases. Apart from this, water pollution is also polluting our rivers. Waste of several industries is polluting the river with chemicals and toxic materials. Due to this, the farmers of the city don’t get fresh water to irrigate the crops.
11.Can you say something about your hometown?
As I said earlier, I belong to Delhi and it is the capital city of our country. It is one of the metropolitan cities in India and is very crowded due to a large number of people shifting themselves to this place for job and educational opportunities. Apart from this, it is one of the tourist destinations as well since foreigners love to visit some historical places here such as the Red Fort, Qutb Minar and others.
12.What do you think are the improvements required to be done in your hometown?
I think there are many improvements needed in Delhi. Firstly, the traffic problem is a big challenge here which should be dealt well by the governments while local residents can also put efforts for the same. Other than this, pollution is increasing day by day which affects the weather here. In this regard, reducing the consumption of fuels by minimizing usage of cars is a good solution.
13.When did you go out with your friends the last time?
Last Sunday, I went along with my friends to watch a Hindi movie in a famous multiplex cinema nearby. I had a lot of fun with them while watching the movie which was really entertaining and it was enjoyable having snacks as well as discussion with them about the movie during the interval.
14.Do you prefer going out alone or with your friends?
I prefer to go out with my friends rather than moving out alone since I feel awesome to spend free time with them. We enjoy a lot with full enthusiasm which relieves me from the everyday stress I face during weekdays. But going alone makes me feel bored and lazy enough to do anything exciting in my life.

celebrity
1.Who is your favorite celebrity in China?
中国最喜欢的名人
My favorite celebrity is Jay Chou who is an outstanding singer and also an actor in China.I was attracted by his special style of singing when I was in primary school. His songs are unique and he has opened up a new era of music.
2.Do you like any foreign celebrities?
喜欢的外国名人
Yes,I do.My favorite foreign celebrity is Robert Downey Jr,who is the leading role in the movie .He is Very handsome and his smile is captivating.
3.Would you want to be a celebrity in the future?
未来想成为名人么？
Well, who doesn’t? Just kidding, but I mean it could be nice to be someone and get all the attention for a while. Having said that, staying famous is another thing. It could be exhausting to always be in the spotlight and be the topic for everyone to discuss, so, while I’d appreciate and enjoy the experience of getting famous, I guess I just don’t have what it takes to live and work as a celebrity.
4.Do you think we should protect famous people's privacy?
名人的隐私应该被保护么？
Of?course,we should protect their privacy. Famous people have borne too much pressure of public opinion,and they also need?personal?life space. Being a celebrity is just a choice of their occupation, they also need privacy and the life of common people.
5.How do celebrities inflience their fans in China?
名人是如何影响他们的粉丝的？
They influence their fans in different ways,such as the preference of choosing clothes or hair styles. Some fans even buy the commodities that represented by their idols whether they need or not.
6.Have you ever seen any celebrity in public?
你在公开场合看到过任何名人么？
When I was a student in university, I went to several live music concerts held on campus. There were famous artists performing in those concerts so, to answer your question, yes, I have seen some celebrities, literally, but I have never had a chance to meet or talk with any of them in?person.
7.Do you enjoy reading about celebrities?
你喜欢读关于名人的东西么？
I certainly do sometimes. It’s nice to catch up on the latest news about my favorite celebrities, to know what they are up to and to have something to talk about with my friends and colleagues. I also have found out that reading about celebrities is the fastest and most enjoyable way for me to pass the time.
关于Fame & Celebrity口语表达推荐
One-hit wonder– person/band that had only one hit song (or movie)
The band Felly was a one-hit wonder in the 90’s, with the song Pump Up the Jam.
Wear many different hats– able to play many different characters
Johnny Depp can wear many different hats, from British pirate to Cuban poet.
Household name– person who everyone knows
Unfortunately, the Kardashians are a household name in the States.
A has-been/ all washed up– person who was famous but is not doing any good work anymore
The New Kids on the Block are all has-beens, except for Donnie Wahlberg, who has a reality TV show and has been in a couple movies.
Limelight– fame
The actress Elisabeth Moss is in the limelight now, after starring in The Handmaid’s Tale on Hulu.

Letters/ emails
1. Do you write many letters or emails?
2. Who do you usually write to?
3. Do you prefer to write letters by hand or to use a computer?
4. What are the differences between emails and letters?
5. Is it hard to think of what to write?
6. How do you feel when you receive a letter or email?
7. Which do you prefer to make a phone call or write an email?
8. Do you think people will still write letters in the future?
9.Do you think some people are still addicted to writing letter?
雅思口语新题范文：Letters
1.Yes, I almost write emails for my clients as part of my job on a daily basis.
2.There are many things I have to write, for example, I usually write end user training for my clients to teach them how to use the system, or I write the development guide for my technical staffs to tell them how to code.
3.If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with writing things with a computer. I believe that in the age of fast pace and a culture of?efficiency, writing with computers can bring people convenience and efficiency. Whereas, hand writing stuff is really hard to share.
4.Well, between the two, a letter is printed or handwritten on actual paper and sent through the mail while an email is typed on a computer, tablet or smartphone and sent electronically. While emails have become a more popular way of communication for individuals and businesses, traditional letters still have a place in today’s modern, tech-oriented society.
5.Normally it seems like a daily routine for me to write emails to my clients about how to use the system; but if they?complain?to me about the poor user experience, I sometimes really find myself getting stuck in how to explain everything to cool them down.
6.I would be feeling excited to receive a letter or email from other because the sender has spent time writing it. Especially when someone writes to me to appreciate me or compliment me about my responsible work.
7.Well, if I were to choose between the two, I will probably go with writing an email because I can have plenty of time thinking about how to express my opinion correctly and clearly, besides, the whole?conversation?can be tracked in the mail list; whereas, you know, making a telephone call usually leads to misunderstanding because sometimes it is not very accurate and obscure.
8.I believe that as a major method of communication between people, letter writing has a vast and interesting history; besides, handwritten letters are?personal. They show the receiver that someone has spent time and effort in communicating with them. They are a way of connecting two people that cannot be achieved through the impersonal use of texts or instant messages. Therefore, I feel that the handwriting letters are irreplaceable in the future.
9.Very few on that note. Generally everyone prefers letters but there are some who are crazy about them. My mother is one such person. She is so fond of letters that no matter how many other things I give to her, every letter that I write makes her happier than anything in the world.
绝对口语地道语料：letters
1.There is so much value in hand written letters, people cherish them, they wait for them with anticipation, they open them in a ceremonial way, they keep them for years, they read them and re-read them multiple times.
I hope you too will decide to write a letter soon, the person at the receiving end will remember you forever.
学习表达：cherish, wait with anticipation, in a ceremonial way
2.the decline of the physical letter as a communication, with replacement by instant and ephemeral electronic media, will have a long term societal effect. We just don't yet know exactly what that will be.
学习表达：instant and ephemeral, with replacement by...
3.Hand written letters are always special no matter how good or bad is the handwriting of the person or the subject of the letter. Hand written letters also conveys that the person really means what he wrote. People tend to lie while texting but when it comes to handwritten letters our conscience encourages us to be candid and express exactly what we feel.
学习表达：又是一番对手写信的热情洋溢的讴歌。convey, means, tend, when it comes to
4.A lot of things about the letter make me yearn to receive or send one. Like the smell of a fresh letter. The way in which it was written. Every word from the heart. And one of the best things from the letters were the stamps. As a stamp collector, the yearning grows even more. I still remember how I used to search for a new stamp on the letters and patiently remove it from them, so that it can be added to my collection.
学习表达：yearn, the yearning grows
5.Putting aside the legal or obligatory stuff, I think that a hand-written letter is much more intimate and personal. It shows that you actually spent time writing it and even if you have a poor hand-writing, that would still be unique.
I'd been writing letters to my girlfriend who at that time was living abroad. And getting a letter from her about once in a month, with her hand writing and all that cannot even be comparable to getting a lousy e-mail.
That may have sounded just a little bit cheesy but with all the electronic and fabricated stuff surrounding us, we need more and more "personal touch" and hand-written letters are a good example of that.
学习表达：形容词intimate and personal, comparable, lousy,cheesy, 金句：with all the electronic and fabricated stuff surrounding us, we need more and more "personal touch" and hand-written letters are a good example of that.

Meals
1. What kinds of meals do you like?
2. Do you often dinner with your family or friends?
3. When do you usually eat dinner?
4. Are there any fruits or vegetables you don’t like? Why?
5. And what is your favourite cuisine?
6. What kinds of meals do you like?
7. Do you often dinner with your family or friends?
8. When do you usually eat dinner?
9. Are there any fruits or vegetables you don’t like? Why?
10. And what is your favourite cuisine?
雅思口语part1参考答案
Oh, I adore different meat plates… My mouth is watering whenever I see roast beef, grilled chicken or pork chops… However, I don’t like to cook… That's why I often eat ready meals and take-aways.
Well, I try to dinner with my family as often as possible… Unfortunately, I don’t have enough time for such dinners due to my busy schedule...
I usually have main meal at about 4 p.m. … I'm starving hungry by then and sometimes overeat myself...
Yes, there are… I’m not a fussy eater, but I really hate onions and seafood… I try to avoid meals that might contain these products…
Well, I love French cuisine for its versatility and flavorful ingredients.... French cuisine has a variety of dishes, starting from their famous onion soup and ending with cheese fondue... Also, it rarely uses artificial ingredients or flavors.
Oh, I adore different meat plates… My mouth is watering whenever I see roast beef, grilled chicken or pork chops… However, I don’t like to cook… That's why I often eat ready meals and take-aways.
Well, I try to dinner with my family as often as possible… Unfortunately, I don’t have enough time for such dinners due to my busy schedule...
I usually have main meal at about 4 p.m. … I'm starving hungry by then and sometimes overeat myself...
Yes, there are… I’m not a fussy eater, but I really hate onions and seafood… I try to avoid meals that might contain these products…
Well, I love French cuisine for its versatility and flavorful ingredients.... French cuisine has a variety of dishes, starting from their famous onion soup and ending with cheese fondue... Also, it rarely uses artificial ingredients or flavors.

season
1. What’s your favourite season?
2. What do people in your country like to do in different seasons?
3. What’s the least favourite season in your country?
4. What are the differences between different seasons?
5. What season is good for travelling in your hometown?
雅思口语part1参考答案
I guess the autumn is the best time to travel. As it is neither too hot nor too cold, people will feel comfortable to go out. Besides, as the foliage of trees will turn yellow or red, you will find the picturesque views all around you. Wherever you go, you will experience a memorable trip.
When in spring and autumn, the temperature is neither too cold nor too hot, people in China tend to hike in the mountains, or go running. When it comes to summer, people can choose more physical activities like swimming, camping in the forests and playing balls, etc. But in winter, people believe it not?suitable?for outdoor exercises, so they prefer to stay at home for resting.
I’m afraid there is no apparent unfavourable season in my favourite, but relatively I believe summer is least favourite season because it’s much too hot everywhere which will bring inconvenience to everything, especially for people to fall asleep at night.
There are four?distinctive seasons in my country. Basically, summer is the hottest season of the year, while winter is coldest. Autumn and spring are not severe seasons. Moreover, in summers people love to wear light clothes while in winter use of woollen clothes increase. Summer and winter are longer seasons, while autumn and spring are shorter ones.
As for my hometown, I guess the autumn is the best time to travel as in the Huangshan Mountain, it is neither too hot nor too cold, people will feel comfortable to hike. Besides, it will rains a lot which will have the stunning cloud sea in the mountain.

sleep
1. How many hours do you sleep every day?
2. Is it necessary to take a nap every day?
3. Do old people sleep a lot? Why?
4. How to have a good sleep?
5. Do you like to get up early in the morning?
6. Can you sleep well if you are in a noisy environment?
How many hours do you sleep at night?
What time do you go to bed?
Do you have a nap during the day?
Do you think sleep is important?
雅思口语part1参考答案
Usually I sleep for seven to eight hours every day in order to let my body relax. But if I want to do something very important at night, I could only sleep for less than four hours.
Yes, I believe that after having lunch at noon, it’s beneficial for body to take a nap, half of hour would be enough, to brace for the tasks in the afternoon.
Yes, I guess the elderly people do need to sleep more. I believe the reason is that after years of working, stress and the natural process breaks down people’s body until all they want to do is sleep, consequently, their bodies take longer to recharge the batteries.
I believe you have to follow several rules to get a good sleep regularly. Firstly, go to bed at the same time every night. Choose a time when you normally feel tired, so that you don’t toss and turn. Besides, make sure your bed is comfortable so that you can stretch and turn in bed comfortably. As well as that, stay away from big meals at night or try to make dinnertime earlier in the evening, and avoid heavy, rich foods before bed.
Yes, getting up early in the morning is really beneficial for health, because I can enjoy the fresh air in the morning; besides, I have plenty of time in the morning so that I can do some physical exercises liking running and jogging; as well as that, I can prepare a good dinner for the family.
Well, I’m afraid I can’t fall asleep in the noisy place like barking dogs, loud neighbours and city traffic because I used to sleep quietly from childhood. So sometimes I envy someone who grows accustomed to environmental noise and can sleep well in whatever place.
I tend to sleep 7-8 hours during night. However, sometimes due to the work load, I burn the mid night oil.
I have organized my days as such that I go to sleep by approximately 10 pm.
To be honest, I tend to snooze off mostly, after having lunch. It gives me energy required to carry on with the day because by lunch time I start feeling emaciated.
Well, surely yes, it is important. Sleep helps ones body to relax and gain back some energy to perform the task of future. Even more it helps in proper functioning of brain and nervous system.
雅思口语话题Sleep高阶表达
Knackered/Shattered/Exhausted
Nod Off
Barely Keep My Eyes Open
Nap / CatNap
Turn in (early)
I passed out
Tuck You In
Went Straight to Sleep
Tossing and Turning
Night Owl / Early Bird
Sleep in / Have a Lie In
Crack of Dawn
Hit Snooze a Few Times
Won’t Lose Any Sleep Over It
Hit Snooze a Few Times
Won’t Lose Any Sleep Over It
Cliches

Accommodation
1. Do you live in a house or an apartment?
你是住的单家独院还是公寓
I live in a semi-detached house with three bedrooms in a suburb of Manchester. I've lived there for just over a year
2. Which is your favourite room in your home? Why?
你最喜欢的房间
I don't really have a favourite room. But if I had to choose, I'd say the living room because that's where I go to sit and relax.
3. Would you change anything about your home? Why / why not?
你想要改造你的房子么
Yes, I've been?meaning?to redecorate it since I moved in last year. It needs a new kitchen, so that's what I'd change first.
4. Would you like to move to a different home in the future?
未来你希望搬新家么
Yes, I'd definitely move again at some point if I could afford to. I'd like to live in the countryside, or maybe in a different city or country.
5. How is your apartment decorated?
你的公寓是怎么装修的
I don't like lots of over the top decoration, so I guess you would describe it as minimalist. The walls are all white and the furniture is also either white or black. There are very few ornaments or pictures because again, I like to keep things quite minimal and I hate clutter.
6. Do you plan to live there for a long time?
你计划在此处长居么
I really like where I live but it is really far from where I work in the centre of town. It takes around 45 minutes to drive there by motorbike and in the hot season and wet season it can be really uncomfortable, so we will consider moving closer to the centre in a year or so.
7. Do you have a garden?
你有花园么
That's the best part of where we live, we have a huge garden. It takes around 40 minutes to walk around it. It has a few play parks for the kids, a number of gyms and four small lakes. We are really lucky to have it and I try to go for a walk around it every day, if I have time.
8. Are there many amenities?
生活配套设施怎么样
Not really, because it is on the edge of town. If you want to go for a nice meal, use a swimming pool, go shopping or head out for a drink, you really have to drive for about 30 minutes. That's the?major?drawback, but if you are organised and buy everything when you are in the centre of town, it's not so bad.

Space travel
1.Do you want to travel in the outer space?
想在太空旅行么？
You bet! I doubt there exists a human being who wouldn’t jump to seize the chance if they can set out on a space travel, of?course?provided it is totally safe.
2.What would you do if you had that opportunity?
如果你有这样的机会，你会去哪做什么？
I’d like to be the first one who ever set foot on the Mars and I want to check it out whether there is water or life with my naked eyes.
3.Do you think it's necessary to see other planets?
人类有必要去探索其他星球么
I don’t know. I?mean?on the one side the mankind is an adventurous race that should not be bound by earth or solar systems, but on the other side, many si-fis and even some renowned scientists warn of the potential unexpected consequences if we are set to space exploration.
4.When was the last time you went travelling?
你上次旅行是什么时候？
I am not a travel bug that will do all kinds travelling even in the weekends. So maybe it is no or all for me , and the last time I traveled I went across half of the world to the far away north Africa, Morocco with my dear wife. It’s August 2017 and it’s my honeymoon travelling.
5.Do you like to travel by air?
你喜欢坐飞机旅行么？
Not really, since I don’t feel comfortable in the rather cramped?economy?seat which is what I can afford, and the long wait for departure is tiring. So basically the whole experience is worse than that of a train travel in China.

Dream in childhood
Dream in childhood(儿时梦想)
1.What was your dream when you were young?
小时候(年少时)梦想是啥?
I wanted to be a doctor at first, and then a actor, which i have not yet achieved neither.
2.Has it changed?
它改变过么?
Of?course, both of them were out when i get close enough to them and find the nasty truth and details about the two profession, since i don't feel powerful enough to handle them.
3.Will it change in the future?
未来它会改变么?
My childhood dreams are elusive and long gone,and my adult one is more realistic: get a good life-long career in Education and lead a?meaningful?family life with my wife full of travelling and cuisine.
4.Why did you have that dream?
为什么你会有此梦想?
Inspiring figures always tell us to dream big, but i never buy it. i find my life will be totally great and fulfilling even i dream something smaller and ?more common. Maybe the feel of down-to-earthness gives me more aspiration and sense of genuineness of the world.

Swimming
Do you like swimming?
你喜欢游泳吗?
Yes, I do. More now than in the past – I wasn’t so keen on it when I was younger, but since I’ve been here I’ve been swimming a lot more.
Where do (or can) people go swimming in your hometown (or, near your home)?
在你的家乡(或者，在你家附近)人们去哪里游泳(或者可以)?
Okay, well, back home people don’t really swim that much, except when they’re children. We used to swim in the river near our home, especially when it was very hot. Here, it’s different – we have a swimming pool in the apartment complex where were staying, so I probably swim about three or four time a week because it’s a great way to relax, and it’s good exercise too.
Is swimming very popular in your country?
在你的国家游泳很受欢迎吗?
It’s popular with children and young people, but not so much for older people.
Why do many people like swimming?
为什么很多人喜欢游泳?
I guess it could be because it’s relaxing and it makes you feel good, and it’s also a super way to cool off when it’s really hot, like it is here at the moment.
What do you think are the benefits of swimming (or, the benefits of knowing how to swim)?
你认为游泳的好处是什么(或者，知道如何游泳的好处)?
So, knowing how to swim is important, especially for children if they live near water – it could literally save their life if they fell into a river or something like that.
As for benefits, well, it’s great exercise, full cardiovascular benefits for your heart and it’s also low-impact exercise so people of any age can do it without risk of damaging their joints. And of?course, it’s a great way to have fun at the beach with friends – or as we do – at the pool when we’re relaxing.

Dictionary
1. How often do you use your dictionary?
2. Do you like paper dictionary or electronic dictionary?
3. What kinds of dictionaries have you used before?
4. How will dictionaries change in the future?

雅思口语part1参考示例:
I use an electronic English dictionary on a daily basis,since i am used to browsing an English news app during commuting and can spot some new words or phrases so often.
I like them both. I've got a wide range of paper dictionaries for English learning,and it was really a help when i was at university.But now i prefer the electronic one since it can easily go with me.
it won't be a overstatement to call me a English dictionary buff. I have Oxford English dictionary,Cambridge English dictionary for sure. and i also have a oral English dictionary, a dictionary for English slang, a dictionary for euphemism, a dictionary for collocation, a dictionary for grammar.Oh the list can go on and on. But in a nut shell, they are all for English learning.
I believe no matter the dictionary is paper or digital,it is to?satisfy user's need.So in the future, paper dictionary will provide more than just a book. Maybe more dictionaries will have their own websites and online?versions and develop into a community covering more than just language learning.

App
1-4月口语话题之：App相关话题：
1. What kinds of apps do you often use?
2. What kinds of apps would you like to have in the future?
3. What's the most popular app in your country?
4. What was the first app you used?
5. Do old people in your country like to use apps?

雅思口语part1参考示例:
i use social apps and knowledge-sharing apps everyday because the two meet my biggest two needs.
i think in China there are already all kinds of apps to cater to people's every specific need, so it is hard for me to even name one special original app.But i would like the future world to have more apps for knowledge sharing like Quora and Zhihu(知乎).
Definitely the Wechat,China's number one national app.It gets nearly a user pool of 1 billion.And you know what,more than half of them are daily active users. People socialise,buy,have fun and read ,basically do everything on the Wechat.
The first app i really used is an app for podcast,named Zune. it is an app developed by Microsoft for the windows phone. i really enjoyed it so much since i can subscribe to and automatically download all kinds of podcasts from BBC,the Guardian and so on with ease.
Yeah,of?course, how can the smart app developers miss out on so important and vast a population,like 3 hundred million. There are some easy and relaxing game apps for old people and they really enjoy killing some time and even have some online social life over the fun gaming time.









我们坚持前行，只因每一个留学梦想都值得认真对待，我们不懈努力，只因每一次在线托付都无比珍贵。小站集左手名师，右手黑科技为一体的一站式智能学习系统为你全新升级而来。筑梦成长，留学就选小站。2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents occasions.For example,we generally send carnations to our teachers on Teacher’s day to express our gratitudes and send roses to our lovers.
推荐雅思口语语料：Plants
street market
Describe a time that you were shopping in a street market
You should say:
When it was
Where it was
What you bought
How you felt about the shopping experience


color
1.What’s your favourite colour?你最喜欢的颜色是什么?

My favourite colour is white, it is the colour of purity and it also symobolies peace.Besides,I think the white color really goes well with my clothes and shoes.
2.Are there any colours you dislike (Why?)你不喜欢什么颜色(为什么?)
I don’t like the pink because it is too girly
3.Are colours important to you?颜色对你来说很重要吗?
I suppose so. You know, different colour conveys different?meaning?to people. Red represents passion and enthusiasm while black means elegant and stability . So I always choose the?suitable?colours at diffrent occasions.

4.\Were colours important to you when you were a child?所示.当你还是个孩子的时候，颜色对你来说很重要吗?
5.
If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with dark because I believe dark represents stability and formal, for example I always choose the dark outfit in a formal occasion like interviews or reply
5. Are there any colours that have a special meaning in your country?在你的国家有什么颜色有特别的意义吗?
Yes, there are many colours that have special meaning in my country.Taking red as an example, it means lucky and good fortune in China, when it is New Year, people like to wear red clothes,pull up red couplets and give red pocket money to children.
6. What colour would you choose to paint the walls of your room?你会选择什么颜色来粉刷你房间的墙壁?
I would like to paint my walls in blue because blue symbolizes the color of the sea as it conveys calm and peace to me which could help me fall asleep.

7. Do you think different types of people like different colours?你认为不同类型的人喜欢不同的颜色吗?
Yes, I believe different people have different psychological demand for colours. Some need peace of mind, whereas others may feel like energetic or try to use different color to show their personalities.
Teachers
1.Do you think you could be a teacher?
你觉得你可以做老师么?
I don’t think I am?suitable?to be a teacher, I am not a patient man and cannot bear to repeat the same things frequently. Teachers’ job is really boring to me, you have to make your explanations as easy as possible for students to fully understand. It is a challenging job, I am afraid I cannot do it.
2. Do you have a favourite teacher?
你有最喜欢的老师么?
.Um… Yeah, I suppose I do, but it’s actually kind of hard to pick out a favourite because I’ve been really lucky with all my teachers.they’ve been really great, at least most of them anyway, but I guess my favourite teacher would have to be my chemical teacher, he was also a vice-principle. You know, a vice-principle have to deal with public affairs.However the amount of?effort?he put into his teaching was more than most of other teachers.He appeared at our class every morning on time,which means if you were late or absent from classes,he would find out.Besides,if you had any study or life problems,you were welcome to ask him for help at anytime.I really appreciate him,I think without his help,I would not had entered prestigious university as it was him that help me form a good study habit,which I will beneft from all my life.
?
3.What are the qualities of a good teacher?
好老师所具有的品质有?
I think that a good teacher is one who always is well prepared for the class instead of just reading the courseware word by word. And a good teacher should also?has a good sense of humour as, you know,nobody would sit in the class, hours after hours.
4.Should teachers use discipline in the classroom?
老师可以在教师里规训学生么?
I think yes, teachers should discipline students. In China, students should respect the teachers. 
5.Do you want to be a teacher someday?
你将来想成为老师么?
Umm! not really. I have not given it that much thought.Entering in the teaching profession is not the one that ever attracted me as I think teaching students the same content over and over again is very boring.
6. Why people choose to become teachers?
人们选择做老师的理由是?
People mostly choose to be teachers because this is the profession which is praised across the world. People always pay proper respect to a teacher regardless of geographical location. Moreover, Being a teachers could get a great sense of achievement if their students could become useful to the society in the future.
7.What kind of person makes a good teacher?
怎样的人会成为一个好老师?
The teachers help the students to grow. So, to be a good teacher, one needs to be sincere and patient. If students do not have good command of relevant knowledge,repeating teaching the same knowledge is needed. Moreover, vast subject knowledge is also required or you cannot share knowledge with your students. 8.Do you like strict teachers?
你喜欢严格的老师么?
Yeah I do. I have no problem with them at all, as long as they’re fair! Because I think, on the whole, they tend to set high standards, and so consequently, that makes us work harder and learn more. And the other good thing about strict teachers is that they keep students in line, which means that the class won’t be interrupted by naughty students who just want to joke around and be a nuisance.
9.What’s the difference between young and old teachers?
年轻的老师与年长的老师有什么区别?
There’s probably not all that much difference actually, but I guess the main one would be the level of experience. You know, I think it’s fair to say that old teachers tend to have more experience than young ones, and so they’ll be more skilled at adapting to any kind of situation that might arise in class, whereas young teachers might struggle. So that’s one difference, and I suppose another might be the use of technology, cos probably a lot of old teachers might stick to the traditional teaching methods they’re familiar with, whereas young teachers, I think, are more likely to bring technology into their teaching, such as using iPads and laptops in class. So yeah, I’d say these are probably the main differences.

Punctuality
1.Do you keep track of time usually?
你经常掌握时间么？
I certainly do. I think it’s important for most people nowadays to be able to keep track of time because we are living in a such a fast paced world where, the faster you are at doing things, the more likely you are to be successful.
2.Can you describe yourself as a punctual?person?
你可以称自己为守时的人的么？
I think I am，at least I always try to be on time. But you know, living in a city where traffic jam is an unavoidable part of the daily life makes it difficult to be a punctual person. But I wouldn’t want to use it as an excuse so I tend to set out earlier when I go to an appointment just in case.
3.Do you wear a watch?
你戴手表么？
I like wearing watches and I used to wear them. However, with changing times, I have stopped wearing one and I watch time by mobile phone.
4.Do you think it is important for an individual to be on time?
你认为守时对一个人重要么？
I think it is quite of a relative question. So, it mostly depends on the situation. For example,compared with party or travelling, if an individual is late for a meeting or a flight, the person is going to lose lot of things. Also, if you know someone is waiting for you, one must try to be on time.

5.How do you feel when others are late?
别人迟到你会作何感想？
I really don’t like people getting late.,especially for those who make various excuses for their late such as traffic jam or oversleeping.I think such this behaviour is quite irresponsible to others.
6.How often are you late?
你多久迟到一次？
For most part, I try to be on time, but sometimes in order to finish my assignments I may stay up late and oversleep the next day.But, in formal situations like meetings or for flights, I am punctual enough in case of causing any trouble.
7.Do you feel guilty when you are late?
迟到时你会觉得内疚么？
I think it is quite of a relative question .For me, being late for class for less than five minutes is not a big deal .But if someone especially your tutor or boss is wating for you, I will definitely feel bad
8.What are some of the ways by which you think people can come on time?
有哪些守时的方法？
Well, I believe being on time is just a matter of attitude.every time you are late for the small things that do not matter much, there are more chances that you are likely to be late when big things come up. Also, if you consider something matter, there are less chances that you shall be late for it.Setting alarm clocks is also an effective way.
9.When does time seem to move fast, and when does it seem to move slowly?
什么时候你觉得时间过得很快，什么时候觉得过得慢？
How long is one minute,this depends on if you are inside 
or waiting outside of the toilet.If you do something you like, you will feel that one hour is as long as one minute and the other way around.

10.If you could go back in time, what is the one thing you would do differently?
如果你可以回到过去，有哪件事，你会以不同的方式去做？
There is nothing much that I wish to change with my life, but if there could be one thing, I think that I want to spend more time with my parents and grandparents when I was a child .As when you grow up,due to your college study or work.The time you stay with them is quite limited and sooner or later, they will leave the world before you.

animals
1.Do you like animals?
 I don’t hate them. I am not very much of an animal lover but I like them if they exist and I am able to see them. But, owning an animal might be something I won’t prefer as looking after the animals could be really troublesome.


2.What’s your favorite animal? Why?
I love dogs a lot. I think they are the best friends of human.Compared with ohter animals,dogs are more clever and loyal,and you could also play with them.

3.Are people in your country fond of animals?
 Yes, they are. People in my country love animals. You could find a dog or a cat being owned by a family. And it is not for any monetary reasons but because they love being around them and caring for them. Animals do bring a certain extent of happiness to the people.
4.What kinds of animals as a pet do the people have in your country?
As a pet, most of the people have dogs in their house. Dogs are preferred over other animals because firstly they are very loyal to their owner. Also, the small dogs are adorable while the large dogs could guard the house for us.
5.Compared with the past, have there been any changes concerning pets in your country/hometown?
Definitely yes, there have been many observable changes in our country.For example,people in the past like keeping the large dogs to guard their houses while at the present time people tend to keep pet dogs as their life companions.

6.Do you think cities are?suitable?places for keeping a pet?
you can take your pets to the nearby pet clinic and see a veterinarian or get them vaccinated.you can also take your pets to pet center.Besides the supermarkets in cities provide a variety of pet foods.Compared to rural areas, it is easier to keep pets in the city

7.Do children like animals?
 I assume It all depends。Some children love animals and regard them as their friends while there are also children who scared of them and not like them. Also, there are some who like to irritate animals just for the sake of fun.
8.What kind of animals do you think children like?
I think for most part, children love dogs and cats. Because compared with other animals they are more clever anad friendly.By playing with them,children can have a lot of fun.
10. Did you have any pets when you were a child?
When I was a child, I really hoped that I could have a pet dog, but my parents never gave me a chance as they think keeping pets is really troublesome and time-consuming
11.What do you think are the benefits of a child having a pet?
I think the most evident benefit is it could mould children’s characters in a positive way.For example,by raising pets and playing with them, children could develop a sense of responsibility and become more compassionate and caring.
12.If you have children in the future, will you allow them to raise a pet?
Definitely yes. I think having a pet in the house is very important because it allows the kids to learn about love, patience,and so much more. It could brings happiness and togetherness.

High school
1.How old were you when you started school?
I started my elementary school since seven year old.
2.Where did you go to school?
3. How did you get to school each day?
My school was just located near my home, about 5minutes’walk,so every day I walked to school by myself
4. Tell me something about the school. (=Can you describe it?)
My school is called the Tiantao Elementary School, which was established 40 years ago in my hometown. The school was large with about 800 students. Besides, the teachers there were always kind-hearted and responsible for their teaching.






5Did you enjoy it? (Why?/Why not?)
Definitely yes, those days are really memorable for me as compared with Junior and Senior school,I didn’t have the stressful study burden at that period, so most of time I played with my classmates a lot. Therefore, it’s a golden period of my life and these days never come back.

6.What were some of the most popular activities at primary school?
There are several engaging activities in my school, such as sports meeting when the whole school played sports together. There were some exciting competitions like 100 metres dash, or relay race. Besides, we went autumn and spring outing every year to some local natural sceneries. We could have a picnic and enjoy the happy time with our classmates there.
7.Have you ever returned to see your old school again?
 As my old school is not far away from the place I live .Every time I go back to my hometown, I’d like to visit my old school and I’ll be very delighted to see how my school developed. I was really proud of it.
8.Are you still in contact with any of the friends you had in primary school?
Yes, there were several close friends when I was in my elementary school, and we still keep in touch with each other. We cherish our friendship and we have a party almost every year.

9.What subjects did you study in secondary school (=high school)?
There were many subjects we had to learn at secondary school, such as maths, English, physics, chemistry,?history, geography, biology and so on. So you can see we really had a heavy burden at that time.

10.What was your favourite subject in secondary school (=high school)?
In my secondary school, English was my favourite subject because I found it more interesting and easy to learn compared with other subjects.I always got a high score in English test.

11.And which subject did you like the least? (Why?)
As for my unfavourable subject, I guess the politics was the most disgusting subject because I had to remember endless and?meaningless essays in order to pass the exams by rote. It was really a waste of my time.

12.Which secondary school subject do you think is most useful for people in adult life?
I believe that the physics was quite helpful in both my study and life.As you could do various sports in PE class,which woul help you keep in good shape and recharge your battery at the same time.

13.What part of your secondary school education did you enjoy most?
I think I enjoyed the PE class most.As in secondary school,you had to learn many subjects and do endless exercises.So PE class was a good stress reliever and could also help you recharge your battery.

14.How do you feel about your high school (secondary school)?
I believe that my secondary school had taught me how to endure hardships if I wanted to achieve my goal. You know, in my country, the competition of entering university is badly fierce, as you need to in top 10% in order to enter a good university.so I had to work very hard in order to be eligible to pursue my education in the future.

15.Why did you choose to attend that particular school?
I guess is that my secondary school has a rich history and provides a good learning atmosphere for us.The teachers there were strict and helpful and we put in 14 to 18 hours a day studying .As a result,including myself,many students in our school get accepted to a good university every year.

Daily Routine
1.what is the busiest part of the day for you?
From about 8 o'clock to 6 pm. That is when i have to attend class and prepare for English test.so time is very tight for me
2.What part of your day do you like best?
My favourite part of the day is early morning, because it is a beginning of a brand new day, and you should go on fighting for your dream.the weather is generally pleasant and cool.
3.Do you usually have the same routine every day
Almost. I start my day with white coffee, then rush to the train station to go to work and back home. Not too much room for flexibility when you work 9 hours a day and you are 12 hours out of the house. I dream of becoming a freelancer especially for this reason.
4.What is your daily routine?
In a typical weekday I have to wake up a bit early and revise my university lessons and then I rush to the university campus to attend the lecture. At around 2.00 pm I eat my lunch in the cafeteria and spent the whole evening in the library. After I return home at around 7.00 pm I spent my time in my study room and have my dinner with my family members. I watch a news channel for an hour and then get back to my room. I read a story book for a while and at around 1.00 am I go to bed.
5.Do you ever change your routine?
I always want some changes in my life, so my routines also are constantly changing. I do not like to have mundane or routine set of activities each day, that would be boring. Also, having different patterns can keep others guessing about your whereabouts, just adds to the security factor!
6.Do you think it is important to have a daily routine?
Not really. I try to make each of my day a little different to the?previous?one, to keep me motivated and to add to the fun.
7.What would you like to change in your day to day routine?
I would like to get up earlier in the morning than I do now. Next, I would like to take up regular exercises in a gymnasium. Apart from that, I would like to leave office/ university early to walk in the park for an hour. Apart from that, my current daily routine is all good.
8.Are all your days the same?
Not really. For me, a day-off is quite different than the busy working day in every?perspective. Apart from that different circumstances and events make the days different from each other. While Sunday is a day to spend time with my family members and to meet friends and play with them in the evening, I have a tight schedule at the university and work on Monday.
9. when time do you get up?
Well, let's see. Some days I wake up early. Maybe about 6 o'clock. Yeah, sometimes I wake up at 6 o'clock.When I get up early, I like to get ready for the day, take a shower and have breakfast. But other days, I don't like getting up early. Maybe I'll sleep in until 10:00 or 11:00.

Work&study
work
1. Do you work or study?
· I graduated a few years ago and I’m now in full time employment.
2. What is your job?
· I’m currently an English teacher working for the British Council in Ho Chi Minh City.
3. Why did you choose that job?
· I was?previously a lawyer and found it to be really stressful and never had any free time, so after quitting that job I thought teaching might be the?complete?opposite of being a lawyer, you know not as stressful and more time off.
4. Are there lots of English teachers in Ho Chi Minh City?
· Oh yes! There is a such a big demand for English as a second language here and it’s also quite a cheap place to live compared to many other big cities in Asia.
5. Do you enjoy your job?
· Most of the time. It’s very rewarding to be able to help people every day and the students here are very hardworking and fun to teach, but you sometimes have lessons that do go so well and the money could always be better.
6. Do you get on well with your co-workers?
· Yes, fine. I don’t really see work as part of my social life, so I don’t socialise with them, so I suppose I could be more friendly, but it’s just my nature to be a bit colder with colleagues. I think it’s more professional to be that way.
7. What was your first day at work like?
· There were lots of teachers starting at the same time as me, 10 I think, so we all had a big induction day. The more senior teachers ran workshops with us to familarise us with the different systems they had and then we went for a team dinner in the evening.
8. What responsibilities do you have at work?
· All of the teachers main responsibility is to plan good lessons and then teach them to the best of our ability. On top of that we have several admin. tasks to carry out like mark homework, fill out attendance sheets and write reports.
9. Would you like to change your job in the future?
· Yes, as I said before, I like working by myself, so I would like to be my own boss. I’m currently developing my own website, so if it’s successful I will leave teaching and work on it full time. This will also give me more time to work on other projects.
10. What is your typical day like in work?
· I normally have 2 or 3 classes in the evening and I start the day by doing all the planning at home. This normally takes between an hour or two depending on the lessons. I then take the rest of the day to spend with my family, before going to work around 3 to print off my materials and then I teach all evening.
11. What would you change about your job?
· As with most English teachers, we have to teach what is on the curriculum and this can mean that you are teaching some things that are quite boring or not very useful for your students, so I would like to have more freedom to teach outside the syllabus.
12. What do you do?
13. Presently, I am working with Fox Traveller as a host for their show that involves travelling around India and discovering its culture and people. We already have covered the southern part of India and now we shall be moving towards the eastern part. The show will go on air in January next year.
14. What are your responsibilities at your work place?
15. My main?objective?is to make sure that we get the information required. So, for instance, if we are travelling to Mysore, instead of talking about the places everyone goes, I need to make sure we cover the places no one ever has. Like the best and the cheapest place to eat. It requires lot of research and I mostly go to the place 10 days before our team arrives.
16. How many hours do you work each day?
17. Well, we don’t have any particular routine. Sometimes the work demands us to work ten hours, sometimes more than that, sometimes less. So, it is all on the location and the time it requires to give us the required information. Also, for me this is something that I love, so mostly work doesn’t seems like work.
18. Do you enjoy your work?
19. Oh! I love it. The feeling that you get after meeting so many people and talking with them and realizing how happy they are after all the issues they have. I remember we went out to shoot a village in Mysore and initially we thought the people would be very unhappy because of the limitations they had, but to our surprise they were all very happy and it was fun knowing their ways of living.
20. If given a chance to change your work place, would you do that?
21. At present, my workplace is great for me. I am loving the people I work with and enjoy the work that I am doing. So as of now, I don’t see myself changing the place. But, may be after some time, if the work is getting repetitive or there is no more learning for me, I may change.
22. Is there some other kind of work you would prefer to do?
23. I surely love the work that I do, but may be if time allows, instead of hosting shows I would prefer writing about my experiences of the places I visit. May be because when one writes a lot more gets expressed which is not possible why saying things off in television.
24. If you could change your profession, what would you do?
25. Well, I think may be I will open a company that gives equal education rights to people. While travelling, I realized that there are so many children who don’t get education, and even if they get it is not of good quality. So, I will open a business that provides good quality education to people who cannot afford it.

Study
1. Do you work or study?
· I’m currently a student at Queen’s University, Belfast.
2. What do you study?
· I study law because it’s a really well thought of degree and I’m hoping to pursue it as a career in the future.
3. Is it a popular subject at your university?
· Very popular, in fact it’s one of the most sought after courses. I think there are about 350 people reading law at Queen’s. I think lots of student’s parents want them to study law so they can get a good job after they graduate.
4. Do you enjoy studying it?
· It’s such a huge subject that there will always be parts you like and parts you don’t like. I find Human Rights fascinating because it can really make a difference to peoples’ lives. On the other hand, modules like Land Law and Equity are really boring.
5. Do you get along with your classmates?
· Yes, they are all really great. Most people like to socialise together in the evenings and this makes us a very tight group. If you know someone socially, it is much easier to work together in class.
6. If you could change to another subject, what would it be?
· I planned to study medicine, but then when I went on work experience I fainted at the first sight of blood, so definitely not that. I’m a real history buff and read books about World War 2 all the time, so I suppose it would have to be Modern History.
7. Do you plan to use the subject you are studying in the future?
· Yes, I’ve already started to apply for jobs as a lawyer. We normally have to secure a job a year before we graduate and then work very hard to get a high overall mark. After that, I will probably do a Masters in law to become a specialist in one particular area.
8. What is the most difficult part of your subject?
· You have to remember lots of legislation and cases and not only remember their names, but also how the affect each part of the law and how they interact with each other. Physically it can also be exhausting because we have to read very dense texts for a few hours every day.
9. What would like to study in the future?
· As I said before, my favourite type of law is Human Rights, so I would like to do a masters in International Human Rights Law. it’s right at the cutting edge of my field and there are also lots of very high profile cases in the media, so it’s really exciting and something I would like to become an expert in.
10. Why did you choose your university?
· Mostly because it is close to my hometown and most of my friends were going there. I kind of regret it now. It’s a great university, but because it’s so close to home it doesn’t give you much of a chance to experience new things and meet new people. If I were to choose again, I’d study abroad.

saving money in childhood
1.Did you save money when you were young?
你年前的时候省钱么
I was never a hoarder of spare money when i was young since my parents have quite strict rules on the money could be disposed of by kids.But i did save 1000 RMB for around 2 years to buy my dream speed bicycle.
2.Do your parents give you money for house cleaning?
你的父母会因为你做家庭清洁而给你钱么?
No, never.Just as they raise me an educated and healthy man for nothing, i, though not so much ,not so often and mostly not so gladly,do the house cleaning for free.
3.Have you ever given money to other children?
你有给其他孩子钱过么?
No, as far as i can recall. Guess i'm not a guy of sharing and i didn't have enough pocket money even for my little fantasies and desires in my childhood.
4.Do you think parents should teach children to save money?
你觉得父母应教孩子节约用钱么?
Yes, i think knowing how to save money itself is a valuable life skill and will benefit your whole life. It is also a habit hard to acquire and it is best for one to understand the importance and learn the skills of money saving from a tender young age, instructed by parents.

Sports
1.Do you like to watch sports on TV?
你喜欢用电视观看体育运动么？
It’s really entertaining to watch sports. In fact, I have subscribed to various sports television channels at my home so that I can?watch?live games such as?the all the world-class football matches or tennis open games.
2.When did you first become interested in sports?
你什么时候开始对体育运动感兴趣的？
As far as I remember, there was a cricket match between India and Pakistan and my entire family was watching that on television. After sometime, the match became dicey and I also started participating in the?conversation. That match fueled my interest in sports and I found myself close to the fields after that day.
3.Do you play any sports?
你玩任何运动么？
I don't prefer a specific kind of sport, but I really like working out in the gym… That helps me to keep my body in a good shape.
4.Do you have a favorite sports star?
你有最喜欢的体育明星么？
I feel that my favourite sports star is Messi who is a forward in Barcelona. He is the perfect blend of speed, strength, skill and toughness. He is also an icon in the modern football.
5.What kinds of sports are popular in China?
中国什么运动比较流行？
It’s very hard to figure out “the most popular sport” in China, but I would say the most popular sports are probably soccer, basketball, track and field (mostly for students), table tennis, and badminton. Some martial arts including Tai Chi are being revived and popularized these days too.
6.What kinds of sports would you like to try in the future?
未来你想尝试什么新的运动？
Well, I guess what I’ll try in the future is the tennis because it can help me build my strength and improve my flexibility and balance. Besides, tennis is social, it’s a sport I can enjoy with friends if I play regularly.
7.Do you think the sports chosen by young people and old people are?similar?
你人为年轻人和老年人从事的体育运动类似么？
Not really. There may be some age-friendly sports like walking, swimming and dancing that all kinds people should and like to do, but in?general, old people tend not to play aggressive team sports like young people madly do, such as football, basketball.



volunteer
1. Why do you think people volunteer?
2. Would you like to work as a volunteer?
3. Have you ever done any volunteer work?
4. Is volunteering worth the time it takes?
5. What could you do to help if you had no money?
6. What is volunteer screening?
7. What situations need volunteer workers?
8. Can you think of different types of volunteer work?
9. Would you volunteer to help people outside your community?
10. Have you read a book about volunteer work?
11. What types of volunteer work would be unpleasant for you?
12. What benefits other than?personal?satisfaction could you?personally get by volunteering?
13. Can a volunteer be treated the same as paid staff?
14. Should you volunteer if your main reason is to benefit monetarily or materialistically?
雅思口语part1：volunteer 参考答案
1. I believe there could be several reasons for people volunteering. Some people volunteer because they feel for the cause and want to do something about it. There are some who volunteer because volunteering teaches you a lot. You learn team work, leadership, patience, organizing things and so much more.
2. Definitely yes. I would love to work as a volunteer for an organization related to education, because I do feel that this is something that every individual has a right to have, but very few are able to get the quality education. Anyone who initiates it in some way, I would volunteer. Or may be in some time, start it off on my own.
3. Yes, I was a volunteer for a group named Soften in our organization. The group organizes lot of activities for the under privileged children and I was part of their three day workshop. During that period, lot of kids from the adoption homes and other sections of society came and it was great to listen to them, their stories, their experiences and so much more.
4. Yes it is. I believe it is more of two way relation where the more you give, the more you gain. There is so much of experience that comes along with it, so much you get to learn and so much of excitement that it makes up for the effort it takes.
5. Helping has nothing to do with money. May be I cannot give someone the money but I can surely give what I have, like my knowledge, my experience, the things that I have learnt. It is great to be able to share your knowledge and for the one who receives it, it is surely a pure joy.
6. Volunteer screening is the process in which people are screened or judged so that they can be given work that best fits their?personality.
7. Situations which affect the larger group of people needs volunteer work. Because at that time, you cannot think about money and then one also needs lot of people. Like, when there was a Tsunami, lot of people died, so many were homeless and then there were many who could not find their loved one. It was such a massive destruction, that required help from the entire planet.
8. Volunteering has its own different shades. There is this volunteering where an individual goes to an organization and works on one of their projects. It could be for a month or a year. And then there is gap year volunteering. This is the volunteering which students tend to do during their gap year. It provides them with the necessary skills for placements. Also, there is travel volunteering wherein the individual can volunteer for different causes while traveling.
9. Definitely yes. Volunteering or for that matter helping has nothing to do with community. If I can help anyone I will be more than happy to do it.
10. There is this book that I read, chicken soup for the soul. It was a great book, almost an eye opener. It talks about 101 inspiring stories that talk about volunteers and their experiences and how they gave back what they got.
11. I think volunteering for something like “trying to ban valentines day” or for that matter “the organizations bringing religious law and order”. These are things I would prefer not to go forward for. Because, they go against my opinion about how things should be.
12. Volunteering has its own great advantages. It increases your social and relationship skills, it helps you make more friends and in some way be more connected with your society. Even more, it helps counteracts the effects of stress, anger and anxiety. Some believe it also helps in fighting depression. Then there are people who are alone, like the older people, volunteering gives them the sense or purpose for life.
13. I think it is quite a tough thing to do. Because, a volunteer is more often selected more easily as compared to a paid staff. There is certain skill set that is required, but with volunteer it is less of risk. It might be possible that a volunteer makes a mistake but with a paid staff the chances should be less.
14. I think, at the first place, the main motive for volunteering should always be to benefit others. However, if one thinks of it in a monetarily or materialistically manner and does it, I think they still should do it. Because at the end both sides gain a lot.

Leisure time
1.What?do you do in your spare time?
I love reading and writing when I have some free time available. Apart from these, I also like playing badminton. So, whenever I do get time, I usually read, write or play badminton.
2.What?do you do to relax yourself?
For relaxation, I prefer taking a short nap. It could be either for 20 minutes or may be an hour. But, nothing helps me relax better than some sleep.
3.What?do you usually spend your weekends?
During the weekdays, most part of the evenings usually gets lost doing the office work. But, during weekends, I work on my blog for the entire day and so during evenings I usually spend some time with my friends, going on long walks together or have dinner at their place.
4.What?do you usually do after work or classes?
There is nothing much that can be done after work because it really becomes quite tiring. So, most of the times I am either working on my blog or writing something or some drafts, here and there.
5.Do you prefer?staying at home or going out during evenings?
I love taking long walks. So, if I am not busy at something during evenings, I usually take long walks with my friends or for that matter even alone at times.
6.Do you?think modern lifestyles give enough time to people for leisure?
I think it depends on the kind of modern lifestyle an individual is leading. So, a?person?doing a corporate job might have less time to spare for leisure activity but probably a person who does freelancing will find more time to leisure. Not because a work is less time consuming but because the way things get done in each. Even more, I think it all depends on how the person sets priorities for themselves.
7.Do you think?people today have more time to relax as compared to that in past?
I certainly believe that people are more busy when compared with their past counterparts. Earlier people lived a content life but with changing times people are less satisfied with what they have and are always on the look out of doing more. This has made lives much more hectic than ever.
8.What do you?think is the importance of leisure time in life?
Leisure is the one thing that makes the life worth living. I surely believe that apart from the daily mundane activities a person should always try to do things that makes him or her happy. It could be either something that he or she likes doing or could even be some person one likes spending time with. It is only through this that a person is able to enjoy life.
9.Do you think?old and young people spend their leisure time in the same way?
I believe it is not about young and old, it is more about individuals. I have seen old people party harder than some of the young chaps out there and then some young people reading better than the wiser older people. In my opinion, it is all about the individual choices that people make.
10.Do you like?to travel in holidays?
Well, I love travelling not only because everyone else does but because for me travelling teaches so much more to me than anything else can ever do. Also, travelling allows me to explore myself and the world in ways that opens up my horizons, giving me a broader aspect of life.
11.If you had a child,?what leisure places would you go with your child?
I think I would like to take my child to library and a field ( could be of any game) as part of leisure activity. Also, I would love to travel with my child because in my opinion, a child learns so much more from travelling,?history?and art than he or she can ever learn from any of the text books or any motivational videos.
12.How much time?do you have each week for doing these things?
Well, I do quite a lot of sport actually. I go swimming twice a week. There’s a very good pool just around the corner from my office. I swim for an hour and do about 40 lengths. I also cycle to work when I can. Apart from that, I do a lot of reading and photography.
13.Why?do you like doing these activities?
When I was younger, I did a lot of surfing. I used to go snowboarding quite often too in the winter. But I haven’t been for a long time, although I might go this year with some friends. These days I go cycling when I can. At the weekends I like to cook and invite friends around for dinner. I’m a big fan of cooking programs, and often try to copy the recipes, but they don’t always turn out very well.
14.Why?do you like doing these activities?
I don’t have a lot of time to myself now that I’m married with two young children. So, a lot of my free time is used taking my kids to their activities. For example, on Saturday morning, I have to take my son to his basketball games, and my daughter to football practice. Then I have to ship them off to parties or friends’ houses. Two or three times a month, my wife and I go for a meal with friends, and once a month, we go the cinema when my parents look after the kids. There’s a great little cinema that shows independent or foreign films just near where we live.
15.How?did you start doing this activity at first?
I have tennis lessons with a group of friends at the weekend. There are eight of us, four moms and dads and four kids. The idea was that the lessons would give us the chance to do something sporty with our children, and it’s great. The teacher is really good and we all have a fantastic time. Plus, we’re getting better at tennis. Best of all, after an hour of tennis, the kids go off to play, and we can have a drink and a chat. Now, that’s my idea of playing sport. Apart from that, I also go out bowling once a month.
16.Is there?some other hobby or sport you would like to try? Why?
I play golf at the weekend. I get up really early on Sunday and play for about five hours with some friends from work. While I’m out, my husband prepares lunch which is usually ready by the time I get back. Apart from that, I play online video games and read a lot. Also, I go for a drink after work every Friday with my work colleagues. There’s a pub nearby and we usually stay there for a couple of hours, which is good fun.
17.How?do you spend your time in the evening?
In the evening, I love to play music and listen to some old Bollywood songs from my favourite song collection. It just refreshes my mind, keeping me away for a while, from tension arising due to the daily routine work. I think it is a good leisure activity that makes you stay away from everyday’s stress.
18.Do you?do this every evening?
Not every evening but most of the times, I prefer to listen to my favourite songs. However, whenever I find some work to do at home in the evening, I avoid doing this. Apart from that, I sometimes like to stroll around the city along with my friends whenever I don’t get a chance to go for a morning walk.
19.What?do you like to do in the weekends?
On Saturday, I often go for watching movies along with my family members but on Sunday, I do not like to do any activity outside and I rather play games with my kids. Nowadays, it is really essential to devote some time for your kids and this is the reason why I prefer spending time with them.
20.Is there?any difference in your life now from when you were a child?
Absolutely yes, there are huge differences! Since I am now a married person with kids to take care of, I do not get enough time for fun and entertainment related activities. But when I was a child, I always used to play games with my childhood friends outside my home in a large playground, for example, we used to enjoy playing cricket vigorously. Moreover, life used to be tension free but now, it is full of stress.

hometown
1. What kind of place is it?
A. I was born in a city where I still reside, which is Nanning. 
My hometown in Nannig, which is situated on the south side of the country.Maybe you haven’t heard of its name,I suppose you must have heard about Guilin,it is a world famous city in GuangXi Province,and Nanning is the capital.It is a beautiful city with the highest green rates in China , it was also awarded “United Nations habitat award”in 2007.
2. What’s the most interesting part of your home area?
A. The modern facilities that have been brought to my hometown are, in my opinion, the most interesting parts due to which I would say that I like my hometown. The medical facilities along with the education have really developed in the past decade or so. In terms of places India Gate, Lotus temple, Qutb Minar, The Red Fort are some interesting places and attraction in my hometown.
3. What kind of jobs do the people in your town/ village do?
A. My town mostly consists of the people who belong to the working class. As a matter of fact, due to the presence of quite a many government offices in the city of New Delhi, a majority part of habitats belong to the working class. Many of them work in Government and semi-government offices while many others work in private organisations and multinational companies. The numbers of business persons are quite high as well.
4. Is your hometown changing?
A. Yes, and in a very fast pace. Over the past few years, there has been a welcoming change as far as the public transport has developed. Apart from this, as already informed, there has been an increase in the area of medical facilities in the form of hospitals catering with up to date and latest machines. More and more people are coming to live in the capital city for better employment, education and treatment. As a result, the population here is also increasing.
5. Would you say it is a good place to live? Why?
A. Yes, it definitely is a good place to live in. There are various opportunities for the employment and education, the transportation facility is nice and the beautiful and planned city is indeed a nice place to live in.
6. What changes would you like to make to your hometown?
A. The one change that I would definitely like to make to my hometown is the safety for the women. Of late, there have been instances when women have been harassed in my city. This one thing has brought shame to my town, so it would be my endeavour to bring this change to my city. Apart from that, I would like to change the way some business markets have emerged. I would like the city to have more security and law enforcing force and security camera to monitor every street vulnerable to crime.
7.What are the advantages of living in your hometown?
Answer: Obliviously, there are a variety of merits of living in this city. However, I guess the most evident would be that it is very well developed and every amenity is at a walking distance such as hospital, school, park, library and even shopping arcade. Another favourable part is its public transport in which most of the people travel daily like Metro and buses.
8.What are some problems faced by your hometown?
Answer: Apart from the problems, I illustrated above; I would say that as people from different cities are continuously moving to this urban area, housing problem emerged and it is becoming upmarket now. So, I believe that this city is very crowded now. Another drawback of this is that the beds are not available in government hospitals. So, I think there is also a shortage of medical facility now. I feel that our governing authorities should address this problem before it becomes serious.
9.Compare your hometown with another city.
Answer: If I compare my town with a smart city like London. I would like to say that this city is still lacking behind in several aspects. Firstly, we don’t have world class infrastructure such as wider roads to?accommodate?traffic. Secondly, public transportation such as Metro is still in its?construction?phase in several areas of the city. Finally, it is one of the most polluted cities of the world so many people are suffering from diseases.
10.What are some environmental problems faced by your hometown?
Answer: As I told earlier, air pollution is the biggest stumbling block for many people living here as they are suffering from diseases. Apart from this, water pollution is also polluting our rivers. Waste of several industries is polluting the river with chemicals and toxic materials. Due to this, the farmers of the city don’t get fresh water to irrigate the crops.
11.Can you say something about your hometown?
As I said earlier, I belong to Delhi and it is the capital city of our country. It is one of the metropolitan cities in India and is very crowded due to a large number of people shifting themselves to this place for job and educational opportunities. Apart from this, it is one of the tourist destinations as well since foreigners love to visit some historical places here such as the Red Fort, Qutb Minar and others.
12.What do you think are the improvements required to be done in your hometown?
I think there are many improvements needed in Delhi. Firstly, the traffic problem is a big challenge here which should be dealt well by the governments while local residents can also put efforts for the same. Other than this, pollution is increasing day by day which affects the weather here. In this regard, reducing the consumption of fuels by minimizing usage of cars is a good solution.
13.When did you go out with your friends the last time?
Last Sunday, I went along with my friends to watch a Hindi movie in a famous multiplex cinema nearby. I had a lot of fun with them while watching the movie which was really entertaining and it was enjoyable having snacks as well as discussion with them about the movie during the interval.
14.Do you prefer going out alone or with your friends?
I prefer to go out with my friends rather than moving out alone since I feel awesome to spend free time with them. We enjoy a lot with full enthusiasm which relieves me from the everyday stress I face during weekdays. But going alone makes me feel bored and lazy enough to do anything exciting in my life.

celebrity
1.Who is your favorite celebrity in China?
中国最喜欢的名人
My favorite celebrity is Jay Chou who is an outstanding singer and also an actor in China.I was attracted by his special style of singing when I was in primary school. His songs are unique and he has opened up a new era of music.
2.Do you like any foreign celebrities?
喜欢的外国名人
Yes,I do.My favorite foreign celebrity is Robert Downey Jr,who is the leading role in the movie .He is Very handsome and his smile is captivating.
3.Would you want to be a celebrity in the future?
未来想成为名人么？
Well, who doesn’t? Just kidding, but I mean it could be nice to be someone and get all the attention for a while. Having said that, staying famous is another thing. It could be exhausting to always be in the spotlight and be the topic for everyone to discuss, so, while I’d appreciate and enjoy the experience of getting famous, I guess I just don’t have what it takes to live and work as a celebrity.
4.Do you think we should protect famous people's privacy?
名人的隐私应该被保护么？
Of?course,we should protect their privacy. Famous people have borne too much pressure of public opinion,and they also need?personal?life space. Being a celebrity is just a choice of their occupation, they also need privacy and the life of common people.
5.How do celebrities inflience their fans in China?
名人是如何影响他们的粉丝的？
They influence their fans in different ways,such as the preference of choosing clothes or hair styles. Some fans even buy the commodities that represented by their idols whether they need or not.
6.Have you ever seen any celebrity in public?
你在公开场合看到过任何名人么？
When I was a student in university, I went to several live music concerts held on campus. There were famous artists performing in those concerts so, to answer your question, yes, I have seen some celebrities, literally, but I have never had a chance to meet or talk with any of them in?person.
7.Do you enjoy reading about celebrities?
你喜欢读关于名人的东西么？
I certainly do sometimes. It’s nice to catch up on the latest news about my favorite celebrities, to know what they are up to and to have something to talk about with my friends and colleagues. I also have found out that reading about celebrities is the fastest and most enjoyable way for me to pass the time.
关于Fame & Celebrity口语表达推荐
One-hit wonder– person/band that had only one hit song (or movie)
The band Felly was a one-hit wonder in the 90’s, with the song Pump Up the Jam.
Wear many different hats– able to play many different characters
Johnny Depp can wear many different hats, from British pirate to Cuban poet.
Household name– person who everyone knows
Unfortunately, the Kardashians are a household name in the States.
A has-been/ all washed up– person who was famous but is not doing any good work anymore
The New Kids on the Block are all has-beens, except for Donnie Wahlberg, who has a reality TV show and has been in a couple movies.
Limelight– fame
The actress Elisabeth Moss is in the limelight now, after starring in The Handmaid’s Tale on Hulu.

Letters/ emails
1. Do you write many letters or emails?
2. Who do you usually write to?
3. Do you prefer to write letters by hand or to use a computer?
4. What are the differences between emails and letters?
5. Is it hard to think of what to write?
6. How do you feel when you receive a letter or email?
7. Which do you prefer to make a phone call or write an email?
8. Do you think people will still write letters in the future?
9.Do you think some people are still addicted to writing letter?
雅思口语新题范文：Letters
1.Yes, I almost write emails for my clients as part of my job on a daily basis.
2.There are many things I have to write, for example, I usually write end user training for my clients to teach them how to use the system, or I write the development guide for my technical staffs to tell them how to code.
3.If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with writing things with a computer. I believe that in the age of fast pace and a culture of?efficiency, writing with computers can bring people convenience and efficiency. Whereas, hand writing stuff is really hard to share.
4.Well, between the two, a letter is printed or handwritten on actual paper and sent through the mail while an email is typed on a computer, tablet or smartphone and sent electronically. While emails have become a more popular way of communication for individuals and businesses, traditional letters still have a place in today’s modern, tech-oriented society.
5.Normally it seems like a daily routine for me to write emails to my clients about how to use the system; but if they?complain?to me about the poor user experience, I sometimes really find myself getting stuck in how to explain everything to cool them down.
6.I would be feeling excited to receive a letter or email from other because the sender has spent time writing it. Especially when someone writes to me to appreciate me or compliment me about my responsible work.
7.Well, if I were to choose between the two, I will probably go with writing an email because I can have plenty of time thinking about how to express my opinion correctly and clearly, besides, the whole?conversation?can be tracked in the mail list; whereas, you know, making a telephone call usually leads to misunderstanding because sometimes it is not very accurate and obscure.
8.I believe that as a major method of communication between people, letter writing has a vast and interesting history; besides, handwritten letters are?personal. They show the receiver that someone has spent time and effort in communicating with them. They are a way of connecting two people that cannot be achieved through the impersonal use of texts or instant messages. Therefore, I feel that the handwriting letters are irreplaceable in the future.
9.Very few on that note. Generally everyone prefers letters but there are some who are crazy about them. My mother is one such person. She is so fond of letters that no matter how many other things I give to her, every letter that I write makes her happier than anything in the world.
绝对口语地道语料：letters
1.There is so much value in hand written letters, people cherish them, they wait for them with anticipation, they open them in a ceremonial way, they keep them for years, they read them and re-read them multiple times.
I hope you too will decide to write a letter soon, the person at the receiving end will remember you forever.
学习表达：cherish, wait with anticipation, in a ceremonial way
2.the decline of the physical letter as a communication, with replacement by instant and ephemeral electronic media, will have a long term societal effect. We just don't yet know exactly what that will be.
学习表达：instant and ephemeral, with replacement by...
3.Hand written letters are always special no matter how good or bad is the handwriting of the person or the subject of the letter. Hand written letters also conveys that the person really means what he wrote. People tend to lie while texting but when it comes to handwritten letters our conscience encourages us to be candid and express exactly what we feel.
学习表达：又是一番对手写信的热情洋溢的讴歌。convey, means, tend, when it comes to
4.A lot of things about the letter make me yearn to receive or send one. Like the smell of a fresh letter. The way in which it was written. Every word from the heart. And one of the best things from the letters were the stamps. As a stamp collector, the yearning grows even more. I still remember how I used to search for a new stamp on the letters and patiently remove it from them, so that it can be added to my collection.
学习表达：yearn, the yearning grows
5.Putting aside the legal or obligatory stuff, I think that a hand-written letter is much more intimate and personal. It shows that you actually spent time writing it and even if you have a poor hand-writing, that would still be unique.
I'd been writing letters to my girlfriend who at that time was living abroad. And getting a letter from her about once in a month, with her hand writing and all that cannot even be comparable to getting a lousy e-mail.
That may have sounded just a little bit cheesy but with all the electronic and fabricated stuff surrounding us, we need more and more "personal touch" and hand-written letters are a good example of that.
学习表达：形容词intimate and personal, comparable, lousy,cheesy, 金句：with all the electronic and fabricated stuff surrounding us, we need more and more "personal touch" and hand-written letters are a good example of that.

Meals
1. What kinds of meals do you like?
2. Do you often dinner with your family or friends?
3. When do you usually eat dinner?
4. Are there any fruits or vegetables you don’t like? Why?
5. And what is your favourite cuisine?
6. What kinds of meals do you like?
7. Do you often dinner with your family or friends?
8. When do you usually eat dinner?
9. Are there any fruits or vegetables you don’t like? Why?
10. And what is your favourite cuisine?
雅思口语part1参考答案
Oh, I adore different meat plates… My mouth is watering whenever I see roast beef, grilled chicken or pork chops… However, I don’t like to cook… That's why I often eat ready meals and take-aways.
Well, I try to dinner with my family as often as possible… Unfortunately, I don’t have enough time for such dinners due to my busy schedule...
I usually have main meal at about 4 p.m. … I'm starving hungry by then and sometimes overeat myself...

4. How to have a good sleep?
5. Do you like to get up early in the morning?
6. Can you sleep well if you are in a noisy environment?
How many hours do you sleep at night?
What time do you go to bed?
Do you have a nap during the day?
Do you think sleep is important?
雅思口语part1参考答案
Usually I sleep for seven to eight hours every day in order to let my body relax. But if I want to do something very important at night, I could only sleep for less than four hours.
Yes, I believe that after having lunch at noon, it’s beneficial for body to take a nap, half of hour would be enough, to brace for the tasks in the afternoon.
Yes, I guess the elderly people do need to sleep more. I believe the reason is that after years of working, stress and the natural process breaks down people’s body until all they want to do is sleep, consequently, their bodies take longer to recharge the batteries.
I believe you have to follow several rules to get a good sleep regularly. Firstly, go to bed at the same time every night. Choose a time when you normally feel tired, so that you don’t toss and turn. Besides, make sure your bed is comfortable so that you can stretch and turn in bed comfortably. As well as that, stay away from big meals at night or try to make dinnertime earlier in the evening, and avoid heavy, rich foods before bed.
Yes, getting up early in the morning is really beneficial for health, because I can enjoy the fresh air in the morning; besides, I have plenty of time in the morning so that I can do some physical exercises liking running and jogging; as well as that, I can prepare a good dinner for the family.
Well, I’m afraid I can’t fall asleep in the noisy place like barking dogs, loud neighbours and city traffic because I used to sleep quietly from childhood. So sometimes I envy someone who grows accustomed to environmental noise and can sleep well in whatever place.
I tend to sleep 7-8 hours during night. However, sometimes due to the work load, I burn the mid night oil.

Yes, I've been?meaning?to redecorate it since I moved in last year. It needs a new kitchen, so that's what I'd change first.
4. Would you like to move to a different home in the future?
未来你希望搬新家么
Yes, I'd definitely move again at some point if I could afford to. I'd like to live in the countryside, or maybe in a different city or country.
5. How is your apartment decorated?
你的公寓是怎么装修的
I don't like lots of over the top decoration, so I guess you would describe it as minimalist. The walls are all white and the furniture is also either white or black. There are very few ornaments or pictures because again, I like to keep things quite minimal and I hate clutter.
6. Do you plan to live there for a long time?
你计划在此处长居么




我们坚持前行，只因每一个留学梦想都值得认真对待，我们不懈努力，只因每一次在线托付都无比珍贵。小站集左手名师，右手黑科技为一体的一站式智能学习系统为你全新升级而来。筑梦成长，留学就选小站。2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents occasions.For example,we generally send carnations to our teachers on Teacher’s day to express our gratitudes and send roses to our lovers.
推荐雅思口语语料：Plants
street market
Describe a time that you were shopping in a street market
You should say:
When it was
Where it was
What you bought
How you felt about the shopping experience


color
1.What’s your favourite colour?你最喜欢的颜色是什么?

My favourite colour is white, it is the colour of purity and it also symobolies peace.Besides,I think the white color really goes well with my clothes and shoes.
2.Are there any colours you dislike (Why?)你不喜欢什么颜色(为什么?)
I don’t like the pink because it is too girly
3.Are colours important to you?颜色对你来说很重要吗?
I suppose so. You know, different colour conveys different?meaning?to people. Red represents passion and enthusiasm while black means elegant and stability . So I always choose the?suitable?colours at diffrent occasions.

4.\Were colours important to you when you were a child?所示.当你还是个孩子的时候，颜色对你来说很重要吗?
5.
If I were to choose between the two, I’ll probably go with dark because I believe dark represents stability and formal, for example I always choose the dark outfit in a formal occasion like interviews or reply
5. Are there any colours that have a special meaning in your country?在你的国家有什么颜色有特别的意义吗?
Yes, there are many colours that have special meaning in my country.Taking red as an example, it means lucky and good fortune in China, when it is New Year, people like to wear red clothes,pull up red couplets and give red pocket money to children.
6. What colour would you choose to paint the walls of your room?你会选择什么颜色来粉刷你房间的墙壁?
I would like to paint my walls in blue because blue symbolizes the color of the sea as it conveys calm and peace to me which could help me fall asleep.

7. Do you think different types of people like different colours?你认为不同类型的人喜欢不同的颜色吗?
Yes, I believe different people have different psychological demand for colours. Some need peace of mind, whereas others may feel like energetic or try to use different color to show their personalities.
Teachers
1.Do you think you could be a teacher?
你觉得你可以做老师么?
I don’t think I am?suitable?to be a teacher, I am not a patient man and cannot bear to repeat the same things frequently. Teachers’ job is really boring to me, you have to make your explanations as easy as possible for students to fully understand. It is a challenging job, I am afraid I cannot do it.
2. Do you have a favourite teacher?
你有最喜欢的老师么?
.Um… Yeah, I suppose I do, but it’s actually kind of hard to pick out a favourite because I’ve been really lucky with all my teachers.they’ve been really great, at least most of them anyway, but I guess my favourite teacher would have to be my chemical teacher, he was also a vice-principle. You know, a vice-principle have to deal with public affairs.However the amount of?effort?he put into his teaching was more than most of other teachers.He appeared at our class every morning on time,which means if you were late or absent from classes,he would find out.Besides,if you had any study or life problems,you were welcome to ask him for help at anytime.I really appreciate him,I think without his help,I would not had entered prestigious university as it was him that help me form a good study habit,which I will beneft from all my life.
?
3.What are the qualities of a good teacher?
好老师所具有的品质有?
I think that a good teacher is one who always is well prepared for the class instead of just reading the courseware word by word. And a good teacher should also?has a good sense of humour as, you know,nobody would sit in the class, hours after hours.
4.Should teachers use discipline in the classroom?
老师可以在教师里规训学生么?
I think yes, teachers should discipline students. In China, students should respect the teachers. 
5.Do you want to be a teacher someday?
你将来想成为老师么?
Umm! not really. I have not given it that much thought.Entering in the teaching profession is not the one that ever attracted me as I think teaching students the same content over and over again is very boring.
6. Why people choose to become teachers?
人们选择做老师的理由是?
People mostly choose to be teachers because this is the profession which is praised across the world. People always pay proper respect to a teacher regardless of geographical location. Moreover, Being a teachers could get a great sense of achievement if their students could become useful to the society in the future.
7.What kind of person makes a good teacher?
怎样的人会成为一个好老师?
The teachers help the students to grow. So, to be a good teacher, one needs to be sincere and patient. If students do not have good command of relevant knowledge,repeating teaching the same knowledge is needed. Moreover, vast subject knowledge is also required or you cannot share knowledge with your students. 8.Do you like strict teachers?
你喜欢严格的老师么?
Yeah I do. I have no problem with them at all, as long as they’re fair! Because I think, on the whole, they tend to set high standards, and so consequently, that makes us work harder and learn more. And the other good thing about strict teachers is that they keep students in line, which means that the class won’t be interrupted by naughty students who just want to joke around and be a nuisance.
9.What’s the difference between young and old teachers?
年轻的老师与年长的老师有什么区别?
There’s probably not all that much difference actually, but I guess the main one would be the level of experience. You know, I think it’s fair to say that old teachers tend to have more experience than young ones, and so they’ll be more skilled at adapting to any kind of situation that might arise in class, whereas young teachers might struggle. So that’s one difference, and I suppose another might be the use of technology, cos probably a lot of old teachers might stick to the traditional teaching methods they’re familiar with, whereas young teachers, I think, are more likely to bring technology into their teaching, such as using iPads and laptops in class. So yeah, I’d say these are probably the main differences.

Punctuality
1.Do you keep track of time usually?
你经常掌握时间么？
I certainly do. I think it’s important for most people nowadays to be able to keep track of time because we are living in a such a fast paced world where, the faster you are at doing things, the more likely you are to be successful.
2.Can you describe yourself as a punctual?person?
你可以称自己为守时的人的么？
I think I am，at least I always try to be on time. But you know, living in a city where traffic jam is an unavoidable part of the daily life makes it difficult to be a punctual person. But I wouldn’t want to use it as an excuse so I tend to set out earlier when I go to an appointment just in case.
3.Do you wear a watch?
你戴手表么？
I like wearing watches and I used to wear them. However, with changing times, I have stopped wearing one and I watch time by mobile phone.
4.Do you think it is important for an individual to be on time?
你认为守时对一个人重要么？
I think it is quite of a relative question. So, it mostly depends on the situation. For example,compared with party or travelling, if an individual is late for a meeting or a flight, the person is going to lose lot of things. Also, if you know someone is waiting for you, one must try to be on time.

5.How do you feel when others are late?
别人迟到你会作何感想？
I really don’t like people getting late.,especially for those who make various excuses for their late such as traffic jam or oversleeping.I think such this behaviour is quite irresponsible to others.
6.How often are you late?
你多久迟到一次？

我们坚持前行，只因每一个留学梦想都值得认真对待，我们不懈努力，只因每一次在线托付都无比珍贵。小站集左手名师，右手黑科技为一体的一站式智能学习系统为你全新升级而来。筑梦成长，留学就选小站。2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o2018年5月雅思口语话题part1范文
Plants
1.Do you keep plants at home?

No,I am not really interested in plants,however,my father have some potted plants on the balcony and they are well taken care of.

2.What plant did you grow when you were young?
I didn't grow any plants myself but i helped my fathers grow some potted plants and vegetables such as garlics and onions on the balcony.what I did are quite simple like watering and weeding.

3.Do you know anything about growing a plant?

Not particularly,what I know is that before planting,the soid need to be well ploughed.And after sowing,you need to water the plants regularly.


4.Do Chinese people send plants as gifts?

well,I think the answer is yes,most of Chinese send flowers as gifts at differents o